Ditto. I don't know whether to be impressed or be sad, or both, or neither.
You could probably adopt new ones.
Meh, hair isn't "meant" to do anything, and certainly not "meant to look good".
Not to be an internet humor snob but this one of the oldest, lamest, rehashed, piece of s*%t jokes of the last 30 years.  Come on Reddit you can do beter than this.  Seriously
far superior to
It seems like a long range view is only good if you really have a good paradigm. An intellectual knows that he or she cannot be certain about the future or the one best goal.  In fact, I think the only way to have a guiding long term strategy that never shifts is to go on faith - to use moral principles that "seem" true whether they have been proven or not.  I am happy with Obama being pragmatic as long as his pragmatic approaches are defined and assessed based on the situation and to actually better the nation, rather than just being spur-of-the-moment desires. I'll be afraid of Obama being spontaneous when he starts invading countries without need.
I had this happen to me the other night, and I looked it up after some confusion. Had a short conversation with someone, and now I block all messages from the bot.
7/10 of his last submissions are to reportthespammers. I would say he is a member of the reddit spam gestapo.
Looks like the gator got the last laugh, in the end.
Christian Bale and Eric Bana had a love child!
I've heard bad comments on the iPod camera adapter, that it drops photos sometimes. It'd be an ideal solution if it were reliable.  Those backup solutions are ok too, but I'm having a hard time finding a shop that sells them (Europe/Belgium).
**Warning**   In addition to being a repost, repeated viewings of this video have caused my testicles to retract a full five inches upwards into my abdomen, my voice is now 2 octaves higher, my beard has all fallen out, and a consortium of  highly esteemed medical professionals have concluded I might someday be a proud mother. 
Found one in my backyard yesterday, too. 77345.
lol, I should have checked
Sony is so successful today *because* it got into content creation and media IP. Being a good hardware company wasn't enough. But yeah, the rootkit and other nonsense goes too far.  Open standards and lack of content control will be Sony's downfall. Proprietary is the only way the giant can remain standing.
It doesn't exist until they release it for PC, if you ask me
Quit giving this dickhead the attention he wants and he'll fade away in obscurity. EDIT:  Off subject but does anyone else think that when Rush talks he sounds like he's constantly burping up a meatloaf and is moments away from a vomit? 
I won't be able to stay long enough in one place to upload gigabytes of photos ;)
Osama Bin laden had nothing to do with it. How in the world did building 7 fall "demolition style". Wake up sheep. how did it fall, seriously. Go watch the video again and again and tell me how it fell?
I think it was good for a few watches, but I don't think it will stay at the top of the charts in the long run.
I think your taking most of these comments too seriously. Also, you seem like a bit of a prick - but then, maybe i'm taking you too seriously.  EDIT: Also, i like how this comment was doing fine (like +8 or something[as of this edit it's -1], there's a way to check that, isn't there?) until the guy pointed out my typo.   The Redditers are being herded.
Joe the Asshole!
you mean a toothless saber-toothed seal?
Last year I *drove* to the Mossman to see the city.  The irony was excellent.
That shit is old...
What's the future?
It's so easy to see a fault in others and and be so blind not to see the same fault in yourself.  I appreciate your satire.
Didn't New Mexico do the same thing?
Yo dawg...?  I can't help but feel that this is some kind of trap.
Why, thank you.
While I have fairly neutral feelings about the other issues you've raised, OMG, why does the online match making suck so bad?  If I try to connect to somebody elses game then 9 times out of 10 I get a "server full" message. Then if I make my own game I can't choose to fight people who have an similar ranking, so I risk getting trounced by somebody 500-1000 points above me.  For a game that is obviously loved for it's multiplay, capcom made a really half assed effort for XBox Live. I hope it gets patched because I'm loving everything else about it. :'&lt;
You're absolutely right, they should have cast a simian alien to the role of Goku.
Much respect to my Attorney General for simply stating that we need to take a good hard look at our policies.
How convenient the angels of heaven left a very detailed record etched in stone as opposed to some advanced god like rendering burned to a USB flash drive (or something better).
I know I'm being pedantic, but just FYI, the proper abbreviation for PCI Express is PCIe. PCI-X was an older upgrade to the PCI standard.
Things "like" it, but not this particular thing.  You may not agree with their goofy logic (I don't), but there is a logic to it, and this doesn't fit the rules.
Now *there's* a song waiting to happen.
mine did not.
If people want to go for a recipe, I'd say vegetable soup.  That's open enough that everyone could make something, and we'd probably get some awesome recipes.   I'd prefer to go with an ingredient or theme rather than a recipe-  something like "mushrooms", or "something red". It's a great idea- I'd love to see this become a monthly thing. 
Fuck, I've wasted an entirely beautiful Saturday sitting here on Reddit.  Or *did* I waste it? 
That's all you needed to see.  It was a test and you passed.
True.
ZIONISM = SUPREMACISM
Well, whatever works for ya man.
You contradicted yourself. First you said "she can't do much without Obama saying so anyway." And then you said the President is to an extent a PR front man.  They haven't really bitten back since Carter. Nixon definitely became unpopular with the establishment on his way out into resigning, (not proposing that Nixon was a good man).  From what I can tell, JFK was the last President who really cared about ALL. Americans, your average Joes.   Obama hasn't put up a bit of resistance, but instead has lied over and over again.
just wait until you hit the pop up section!
Also a good example of how order can come from chaos.
OK I'll do it -Titanic. The love story part was just crap padding but the actual ship sinking scenes, engine room etc, the attention to detail, the scale of it. To me it was a great film. Edit: Night to Remember was probably as good though much older.
That's OK.  The video didn't show a robot, or for that matter a device capable of making a sandwich.
too funny
I wonder if it will include his white supremacist views.
&gt; In 1943, when the occupying nazis enforced the yellow star for jews in Europe, the king of denmark started displaying one.  [That didn't happen](http://www.snopes.com/history/govern/denmark.asp) and secondly I'd posit that if it *did* happen the Nazis would've simply wiped out the danes as well. They sure showed no qualms about genoicde when it came to non-germanic ethnicities.  That's the problem with promoting pacifism (which you do, and i'm not sure the Danes do)... if the enemy doesn't give in then you die. Pacificist movements only work in the face of an idealistic enemy by showing them how they fail to measure up to their self-image. Seeing black children firehosed and attacked by dogs shocked white America into persuing integration because America thought it stood for equality and only *then* really learned that seperate was *not* equal. Ghandis movement shocked the British because they thought Imperialism was for the good of the natives, and the self-analysis provoked showed they were wrong.  The Nazis on the other hand beleived in racial superiority. There is no external pacificst movement that could convince them they were wrong. If this is hard to wrap your mind around, consider how well black pacifists would have done in a nation where equality was not the ideal, and the KKK was the single ruling party.
Only in Florida.
Let the down voting commence. 
How about "seizing it from somebody who hasn't even been accused, let alone convicted of anything"
Ah true.  Or shot.  We don't know yet.  Which one got shot by Kara again?
Just out of curiosity, where are you on the liberal/conservative continuum?
The problem is that these days a HIGHER level of credibility is automatically given to the women's testimony and less scrutiny placed on her.  Women have anonymity so if they have made similar claims in the past it might not come out.  Men have no such favors.
[Wrong.](http://encyclopediadramatica.com/SUP_DAWG)
Dennis Hopper rarely fucks up when he's being a bad guy.  Blue Velvet still gives me nightmares.
Not really..  there where only around 2000 people in the resistance movement against the nazis, while there where more than 30.000 that joined the nazis as fighting soldiers.   On top of that. The Danes have elected an extreme right wing party into goverment. That  has passed countless laws that violate basic human rights, as many human rights groups have been more than willing to argue.  Denmark is NOT some happy decent place.  The people are small and closed minded, generally racist and basically not very nice people.  Sorry to burst your bubble
Damnit.  I guess I need to go rewrite the ending of my latest script.
I enjoyed it for the first few minutes. Then I realized that the trailer for the film trumped the film itself. Would have made a better short film, maybe around a 1/2 hour.
Definitely the stupidest.
we've got a bad one here, time to muster him out and prosecute him.
I almost quit on the last level of the first sequence. Then things got interesting.
She has no nose.
I think it was meant for the other end.
I thought the second picture itself was the WTF.. looks like something straight out of the Alien movie!
Well you already have a Reddit account. 
And what would you do about it, if the US was out of the picture?  There are no peace deals that make sense for the israelis. Both a one state solution, and a two state solution are death sentences.
Are you going to eat that baby?
It's more free than Qt.
I thought it was kind of a shame that after Jersey Girl, Smith kinda went back to the well of dick and fart with Clerks 2. Not that Clerks 2 sucked or anything (though, it did feel a little forced). It was just a step back.
Closer match: Ronald Wilson Reagan.
Man that sucks!  Did you sign up your cell phone?  How long has it been?  If it has been over a month, file a [complaint](https://donotcall.gov/complaint/complaintcheck.aspx) with them.
One of my favorite SF series of all time. If you can get past the first half of season one, you'll be hooked for the rest of the series.
Way to rip off a Big L line, Xzibit!
Obviously there is no direct correspondence between the governmental structure of any ancient Greek city-state and that of any particular modern philosophy, and elements of many of each can be said to apply to many of the other.  With that said, though, fascists generally aren't into communal property.
Reddit time travel option saves face.
The Atom 330 is a dual core 1.6GHz chip aimed at desktop use. It's not equivalent to the N270 used in the eee.
facts about gorillas 
I used to subscribe but I really feel bad about the gigantic waste of paper... Most, if not all, of their stories end up on their website anyways. And it's free!
Look, just because I whine to get paid more after fucking everything up doesn't mean I should be.   Or, to put it another way - I'll take their job with the cap in place. It's not like I can do any worse...
well put
Because not even pigs have small enough brains not to appreciate bacon.
say that three times fast, I double dog dare ya.
Yup, your source definitely isn't biased in the least...
&gt; It bothers me that as an American, I can't act patriotic and can't take pride in my flag without being lumped in with the mindless ("tasteless" as you said) flag-waving overly patriotic idiots of this country.  Yes, it's a sorry state of affairs. The best thing you can do is working to elevate these people out of their idiocy, so that you can be justly proud together :)  &gt; Either way, I don't think it's ever "tasteless" to be proud of your country, after all, pride in your nationality is not the same thing as pride in your government.  Well, most countries have quite a bad track overall, that's the problem.
Guns have been tightly controlled in Britain for a lot longer than 8 years.  Armed police appeared in London and Birmingham city centres right after the 7/7 bombings. Funny, that.   Also, despite being out of date, those stats seem to mention 2007 and 2008 a lot. Did you fucking read it, or did you skip to the bottom to find that? 
Blither.  Randomly generated text by seven dozen monkeys smoking crack.   
Oh. That. I don't think they have any plans for letting me out.
I've filed three complaints so far. still get calls.
I totally agree. Someone seemingly incapable of adding anything useful to the overall discourse seems to have an incredible bully pulpit. 
Ugh, seriously. I have friends whose opinions I normally respected, except when it came to Twilight. Then they acted like it was the complete awesomeness. (At least one was sensible enough to prefer Jacob Black over Edward, but... yeah.)
Some botnet clients do act as trojan removal to remove competing trojans but the people who run the botnets do not all work together and split up IP ranges. They are all in direct competition and the more zombies they have the more money they make. Some might work together but most do not. They would like nothing more than to infect a PC that was a zombie in some other botnet and add it to their own.
I will now fix this comment with the power of jQuery:  $("sarcasm").fadeOut(100);  I actually do agree with this, it is a useful debugging tool, but should never be left in place on a production site.
THATS WHAT SHE SAID!
What the fuck?!  I can't stop laughing now.
Out of context. What happened before? Where is the audio? I am confident the bitch got the ass beating she deserved. What you didn't see is the half hour she probably spent cursing and spitting at the cop, kicking him and threatening to kill him. You didn't see her puke in the back seat of the cruiser or blather on for an hour about her father the attorney who is going to sue the crap out of the police department.   You're all a bunch of knee jerk cop haters. Don't you ever watch the show Cops? Never saw anyone on the show that didn't deserve a hardy beating, yet the cops show great restraint. And why was the girl in the cell to begin with? I am sure she is a pillar of virtue and did nothing to provoke this.
However right you may be, I still have to downmod you for coming to the atheist subreddit and whining about atheists.
Yeah, same here, I actually don't mind being rickrolled 'cause it's such a good song.
/home and /root (and /boot and /media) are part of the Filesystem Hierarchy Standard. I'm not sure what more you'd want. Yes, you can give them different names if you like, but the same is true of /dev and /proc and /usr and the like.
I honestly lol'd that I got downvoted.  My refutation is valid, your affirmative is false, and that's that.  I suppose nailing it in 3 words is uncouth these days.  Carry on... something about redistribution and the proletariat, I assume.
Isnt being really patriotic a little weird? Its not like anyone chose where they were born. Its like taking pride in being white, or black, or having large feet. You didnt choose any of them, why the need to bang on about it? It doesnt accomplish much, and probably caused a few wars ultimately.
Yes, you said that.  Sorry but the mob eats you.  On anarchism and sustainability, that's false.  Anarchism can be sustainable.  We have evidence.  I strongly suggest you change what you think.
I'm gonna have to sleep with the nightlight on tonight now... again... damn you reddit!!
I can beat that.
Much better than HQ.
Now that's revenge.
&gt;and anytime I start scratching them and thinking about them, I that's why chocolate chip cookies are my favorite, though I won't pass up a peanut butter cookie if they're handing them out for free!  3 cuils for the gentleman in the blue.
`[god@universe earth]$ sudo killall genesis`
"We can't let the serfs get away with anything. They'll rebel and overthrow the ruling class!"
I don't think this is a troll. Go through any current reddit article on the subject, and there are many that wish that Israel ceased to exist. Some are merely too cowardly to say *how*, others are quite explicit in that they wish the jews were either dead or driven from their homes.  Even in this one, we see that.
I could see how some wouldn't like it, but it is a film I have appreciated for a long time. I love it.
http://ninjawords.com/?q=ironically I dunno, I can't say it's really an ironic manner. I think satirically or facetiously makes more sense, tho it's probably the former.
NO, the opposite is true; to withhold knowledge of Christ is neglect to an abusive degree.
Doesn't Conde Nast own reddit?
4 rockets fell today, I believe.
Haha, yeah... I never said I still want to live there... that was more than 17 years ago that I wanted to live there...
Their "goofy logic" is that:  1. women are moral children and should not be allowed to make their own decisions, particularly regarding health care  2. law and public policy should be crafting with an eye for controlling and punishing female behavior  3. There should be no consequences or even mention of any male responsibility for any of the "issues" the right is so concerned about--everything is women's responsibility and women's fault  4. If this harms public health, who gives a shit?  That's the logic, in a nutshell. Some of these folks call for a life-saving abortion to be denied a pregnant woman even if her fetus cannot be saved. In other words, she needs to die just for their gratification. The State Sen's attitude is perfectly in keeping with that.
Now that is hot!
&gt; Crime is the lowest in the world  I doubt that this was ever true, but the ongoing gang war over drugs certainly means that it's false. It seems like people are shot every other day in Copenhagen. It's quite a mess actually.
Yeah, I'm an only child, and I am very spoiled. My dad had time to help me with schoolwork, so I got really good grades. My parents paid for my college education, except for this small scholarship I got and the times I accidentally contributed money to my own tuition. I'm 27 and have a decent job, and they still give me money. I'm quite selfish and asocial. My loner tendencies are probably more inborn than due to being an only child. 
You would think that testifying against her and talking about how uncooperative she was and getting her sent to juvie for a few months would be a good enough lesson.
Mmmm... California cheeseburger.
I'm left wondering how his speaking up made a difference?  I saw Obama's answer to his question, and I think it earned Obama more votes.  It certainly showed me that he could think on his feet, and knew his own policy proposals cold.
I agree 100%, I was confused about your use of the word technology in this context.  It makes more sense now.   
I don't know about a BFG that would make Doom proud. Very few weapons are so awesome that it's possible to fire it at a wall and then just LOOK at your opponent for him to die.
Well, hunter-gatherer societies still had systems of supernatural belief, which should be counted as religious belief, IMO. Indeed, some were very complex. But with regards to the more organized religions which accompanied/spurred the development of more organized societies, you may be correct.
&gt; Eh. I don't buy the whole "I care because my taxes go there." Doesn't explain the vehemence I find around here. I don't agree with everything Israel does, or even most of it, but I do consider Jew-bashing that I see in this and other threads reprehensible.  It's not just the fact atrocities are committed with my taxes, but the viciousness of the Apartheid State that irritates most people.  And I don't "Jew-bash." If you see Jew-bashing, denounce it there and then. Otherwise, keep your red herrings to yourself. : )
St. Bernardus's witbier is amazing. Ironically, the rumor is the Hoegaarden brewmaster came up with the recipe.  Alagash White is pretty gud.  If you're lucky enough to get a lot of Russian River's brews, "Little White Lie" is also great.  A cheap american alternative that's widely available is Ommegang's Witte. It's decent.  BA should be taken with a large swig of salt, but it's useful for finding new beers to try:  http://beeradvocate.com/top_beers?style=48
downmodded for Zzzzzzzzzzzzz
Asimov also did a Guide to Shakespeare.  It's great.
Well... why wouldn't we have churches in Scandinavia? We've had Christianity around for more than a millennia and they are usually pretty nice buildings. Are you suggesting that we tear them down and destroy our architectural heritage?  Nearly everyone is Confirmed in the Swedish/Danish church, but it's really more a rite of passage. We are culturally Christian and the fact that we don't believe in god isn't going to interfere with our traditions that easily. And also, there are presents involved when you have your Confirmation Party.
Fantastic choice.  It's one of my all-time favourite movies, because it's just plain fun, and has Tim Curry in it.  I can never hear [Sh-Boom](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=oR_ds7ZF8Xg)  without thinking of it. 
Ehm, it's called Saturday and it happens once a week.
I'm such a nerd. When I saw the title, I thought it would be a picture of someone using cURL.
I think that's an excellent analogy.  Further, I think think that both teams share many goals in common.  I think a significant percentage, perhaps most, politicians on either side are interested in garnering personal power and wealth and have little regard for the citizenry.  I also believe that issues like abortion are useful to both parties to raise passions and purse-strings.  Drugs, crime, fear- these are useful to both parties and so little progress is likely to made since in doing so both parties would lose power over the people.  Ah, always the optimist!
As of Qt 4.5 (unreleased), they will [both be under the LGPL](http://www.qtsoftware.com/about/news/lgpl-license-option-added-to-qt).
I'm more of a Nikon guy, but I [hear](http://www.phototestcenter.com/html/raw_software_reviews.html) that people love [Capture One](http://www.phaseone.com/4/) for sheer quality. I use Lightroom 2 and Photoshop CS3. (I tried CS4, but found it to be horrifyingly slow.) [DxO Optics](http://www.dxo.com/us/photo) is another good package that I use primarily to correct lens distortion.  [Here's an article](http://www.phaseone.com/upload/capture_one_review.pdf) [PDF] comparing Capture One to Lightroom 2.
would you reconsider if the leafs win the cup?
&gt;can the Lib Dems plausibly take up the opposition role?  Not under FPTP. They're a third party with ~10% of seats in the House of Commons, and while their strategy of building support by creating confidence in the party through its work in local politics is working, it'll probably be at least a decade before it'll pay off. The Lib Dems, unfortunately, have broad support across the country that'd give them a very nice share under PR, but of course neither the Conservatives or Labour'll introduce that as they're both quite happy with the status quo.
Sports reddit is sad.
At least I think its special... it took me the better part of 2 months to create
what about everyone else who dies from cancer? did their loved ones just not pray hard enough, or is god "moving in mysterious ways"? and you have a very broad definition of evidence. anecdotal stuff like that would never hold up anywhere but the church.
You weren't disgusted before? I thought this was  in KFC?
I thought it was awesome.  It just needed a picture of the 'Leave Britney Alone' guy saying 'Leave Elephant Alone!'
lol @ segways  And this story highlights a VERY good point.  Campuses currently are little islands with no security in/out gun-wise, yet it's illegal to own a gun there.  Thus, only the law-abiding citizens get screwed.  The criminals don't care about imaginary "no guns" boundaries!
two photographers · one camera · one weekend · a thousand people  Our project is a true portrait of Britain created by photographing 1,000 people. We stopped everyone who crossed our path on the streets of London, excluding nobody, asking the same question more than fifteen hundred times. In a moment where recession is the main subject of every discussion, it was striking to come across such positive attitude. This is the true face of Britain. 
&gt; She said it was her first protest. “All I’d ever done before is yell at the TV. This is exciting.”  Yeah, but she still doesn't know what she's yelling about. They covered that crap on the local stations here in Dallas, pretty scary stuff when you consider how angry and ignorant people can be so easily manipulated by the corporate oligarchy.
Well, damn. Something to watch for next time I go to London then. 
And not a moment too soon...
Now imagine that *all* meat looks that disgusting, and that's what it's like to be a vegetarian.
Great pic!
&gt; How many people get kicked out of their homes so a tourist site can be built.  Quite a few, you never noticed? Do you think that the highways around Orlando were built for residents?
Video removed,anybody got a mirror?
Or how about God stopping by to tell us himself?  He can create the world, cause floods, impregnate women, part the sea, and help his son with Las Vegas style magic tricks but as soon as the video camera is invented — BAM! — he only shows up on toast.
Yummy lambics. But, I hardly think he'd appreciate a gueuze if his favorite beer is Hoegaarden. Babysteps :)
I...I...was just trying to prove a point....  *Goes away and sulks in a corner*
 Rationing... there you go again.  Healthcare insurers don't provide care, they generate money for the stock market by controlling, one might say rationing, access to healthcare providers.  Obama's plan will make them compete for healthcare dollars, no more no-bid type contracts.  Besides, aren't subsidies like welfare?  Let's let the market decide, OK?
Amazing work. Thanks.
In Georgia just the "3" will suffice.
So my crushing student loan debt will become meaningless?  Yay!
I love this song. The best song on his best album.
Did you read the criticisms section? I'm not saying the results are invalid but the study certainly is. They are very serious shortcomings. As it stands, it is little more than a curiosity.
no, it's the fault of the education system for not teaching people not to eat fast food.
Singing in the Rain.  WTF is up with the hate for musicals these days?
Does it only come in one skin tone?
The original derp http://www.southparkstudios.com/clips/103374  and my favorite use of derp http://www.southparkstudios.com/clips/153784
Abridged versions only have five.
*Si non e vero, e ben trovatto, como se dice en italia.* BTW the article you refer to states that &gt; Although this legend may not be true in its specifics, it was certainly true enough in spirit.  So that doesn't change my point.
Boobs?  Of course.  My point was it's signal noise, and largely irrelevant.  Eventually the bad ideas will get flushed out, and disinfo is false so it's useless against those who fact check.
Also, writing poetry that sounds like how you naturally speak is just *one* way *some* people write good poetry, which is only liked by *some* people (though maybe *most* people). And poetry, like all literature, is always evolving. Poets can't even decide on what is and isn't a poem in some academic circles.  And I agree. As long as you do what sounds good to you, and you actually have some cognizance of objective quality, then it's probably going to be good. 
Wow... I've been this guy before, it's really funny watching everybody fall for my lies.
Wow.
I wouldn't change the float on it to anything other than 'none' which is default anyways.  Otherwise it will screw up.  You can put a border around the text next to the ol with 'border:2px solid;' or change the background with 'background: white;' though.  Might also be interesting to make a text box type background image for it, so it looks like the alien is talking.  But I was saving that idea for a modified blockquotes since you can set an image for that as well.
Intresting, I might try that!
You're not in sales, are you?
The difference Rush, between the Bush years and the Obama years is that Democrats didn't want Bush to fail.  The hoped that he would do the right thing, but were constantly disapointed.  The republicans want Obama to fail, and hopefully will also be constantly disapointed.  The only republican I have any respect for is Ron Paul.  Even though I dont agree with his position on issues, I respect that he at least has integrity and is not a moron.   Which is how politics should be.  Different ideas and perspectives, debated and voted on, without all the pandering by greed and self-interests.
So.  What does "Joe" do other than get credibility and fame for apparently nothing other than knowing McCain at election time?  I hate that this man is now somehow newsworthy.
Oh, that's on your list also? And people call me crazy.
Thank goodness he cleaned his nostrils!
Saber-toothless saber-toothed seal.
Oh well. It is a shame that most people who talk about abortion as "baby killing", from my care more about the unborn than the born. Everyone deserves to be born, but once you are, you are on your own.  I have no problem with abortion in instances of rape, incest, and deceit by the man. until into the sixth month. I got that time from the earliest premie I am aware of. 
"Merit" pay? Not only are their companies in severe trouble, they're taking the economy with them due to seriously bad judgement. In the real world that gets you *fired*
If you throw in those Evil Knievel gloves you've got yourself a deal.
1. Fish eats phone 2. Phone recovered 3. Guts of phone replaced with new parts. (Presumably guts of fish not replaced) 4. Phone still works.  from the article : "I had to get the circuit board changed in the end. But now it’s fine."  Well, I'm not surprised. It is from The Sun, after all - Britains 'favourite' comic.
All my neodymium magnets break up into a dozen pieces when I try this stuff with them :(
awesome? i would have to highly disagree, i have been thinking this bike looks horribly disproportional  i would say they need to rotate the main body\frame of the bike for a better look, so it looks longer instead of squished together
I mis-read it as "Obama" and it was equally cool and not nearly so sinister.
*Going* insane? 
[This guy](http://images.usatoday.com/life/_photos/2007/01/03/pans-labyrinth-topper.jpg)
I'm sure a lot of us have had to deal with stupid shit like this.  There is no real competition while you still can't get a setup that a Telstra fuckup can't take down.
Oh, I don't know about that.  I don't consider myself a Democrat, but I do lean left.  I assure you that I was hoping Bush's suck would stop increasing with each passing day.
BBS's &gt; internet.  You people suck, log off already.
Funny, I thought the exact same thing a few months ago.  It's simply awful.
Therefore, by the transitive property of wishful thinking, it's the Garden of Eden.
Non-linkjacked: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HK_m4Jenwz0
It's a pretty ancient oral sex joke, it could well go back to Cronus as well.
you are an idiot, that is air coming from an underground tunnel and not the explosion, any of the fish that were in it just got pushed around by air bubbles and are fine.
A majority of Linux users\* use mostly GTK applications, so a GTK-based Chrome will fit in with their desktops.  \* GNOME and Xfce both use GTK, along with most desktop-agnostic applications. Only recently has Qt caught on outside of KDE.
Were was his sentry? Damn that's some good spy work.
I was at the London convention, and I can't describe how glad I am that this stuff is finally being done. There are a lot of small interest groups within British politics that care about freedoms, but up until now they've been disparate and unorganised. Hopefully with the start of this initiative, along with the election next year, we'll see some real changes, although there's no doubt it's going to be a long and hard fight.
Man, anyone else pumped for the Jindal-Palin debates!  Solid gold!  
Yes, it did.
More like "girlfriend laws".  &gt;The laws declare that de facto couples who satisfy basic criteria - such as being in the relationship for at least two years - will be treated in the Family Court in the same way as a married couple. It also applies to same-sex couples.
I agree, but pop music being simpler doesn't mean it's any worse. I personally love music that has been created to make an instant impact. It takes a lot of skill to create a perfect pop tune.
Anything by Kevin Smith, Will Ferrell, Mormons, etc.
Tingling spidey sense?
You get used to it after a while, but this time of year you're definitely reading for fucking spring to get here. 
Yeah, but the liberal drum-banning is getting kinda silly. Has no one ever watched these channels? They're presented entirely by perfect twenty-somethings with overly whitened teeth.  Why no ugly people? Why no *old* people? What happens when kids go out into the real world and see a fat person for the first time? :0  I feel for this girl, but its always a bit dodgy when teachers start pushing their own issues onto kids against the wishes of their parents.
This sounds familiar to anyone who has read Ishmael.  East of eden touches on this in a breif passage too.  That agriculture, and the conflicts it created, are the source of some familiar bible stories.  Fascinating.
&gt; Why would he be a bad person?  Being openly religious in Scandinavia means alot of people will see you as some sort of cultist.
[Done](http://www.reddit.com/r/Bad_Cop_No_Donut/comments/813rx/reddit_thread_with_personal_details_of_wingnut/). Thanks for the tip.
Straight people who're embarrassed to admit now how awesome they thought it was in the 80s.
You're clinging rather tenuously to something that is *literally* wrong. Repeating mythology does no good. It's best to repeat the truth rather than exaggerations so future generations know what to emulate rather than simply what's idealized.
 Laff... seriously, go to some of the sites he gets his material from, they're really creapy, it's *much* less painful getting the stuff from a single, known, creep than a whole pack of them.
I wish I could do something like that.
Yeah, exactly like that one - except it was black.
Tell us how you *really* feel about these...
Lesson on the day: Never kick your show at a cop to show him you're a snotty piece of shit. Cop will probably say it's self defense and you will get the snot kicked out of you.  The cop shouldn't have done that but who the fuck kicks shoes at a cop while in custody and thinks something like this WON'T happen. Just because it "shouldn't happen" doesn't mean that's not what *is* going to happen.
If you're not doing anything over the next few decades how would you feel about marrying me?
GREECE! FUCK YEAH!
Damn, beat me to it. 
This is pretty much the case for every time I play ken, outside of fun comboing. But damn it if he's not still my favorite character in EVERY STREET FIGHTER GAME.
Dude, when you have no money, you become desperate. When you're desperate, you resort to crime, because at the end of the day, what do you really have to lose.  Also, people with nothing better to do, often end up doing bad things, this is a big reason for the existence of after school programs.
Dude don't worry we all already knew.  Douche bag.
Get the fuck out of here! You can't be serious!  If you were the country would be burning from all the heathens and their immorality.  How can somebody do good and respect their fellow man if he doesn't believe in god? 
I've experienced this firsthand.  For a while I worked in a Coca Cola plant disassembling old coke machines and rebuilding them into new coke machines.   Also applying decals and labels to new and refurbed machines.   Mindless work and so everyone was glad to have the radio.   Except the old hands there listened to country music.  That meant I listened to country music.  By the end of the summer I could sing along with most of the then current top 10 country hits.  Didn't seem so bad, by the end of the summer :D
www.edenfantasys.com is the best online sex toy shop I have found. They seem to have the best selection of high quality toys as well as your basic plastic vibrators.  I love the fact that they emphasize safety and have rating systems for the quality of materials used in the toys. Also, very LGBT friendly. 
Debian - minimal image - very easy.
FUCK YEH!!FUCK YEH!!FUCK YEH!!FUCK YEH!! drum lines/drum corps are fucking awesome! thanks so much for the video, some of the choreography is nuts and their partner work is perfect!!!!
Uh, I think it is length x width x height. Like x,y,z in a 3 dimensional plane.
I'm so happy you're alive, I thought I was the only one.  I'm constantly getting the "WHAT DO YOU MEAN, YOU DON'T LIKE ANCHORMAN?" line.
You've obviously never delved too deeply into the goofy logic, or you'd know that you have it wrong.  It's hard to call your description of it a parody, since it's equally as goofy as the real thing, however, it is still incorrect.  Since you're unable to discuss this reasonably, and prefer to make things up, what more can I say though? I dislike the religious goofies myself, but failing to understand them does no one any good.
Looks like a harlequin fetus.  Warning: do not look up harlequin fetus.
Yo dawg, I heard you hate "sup dawg" so I put a "sup dawg" in your "yo dawg" so you can hate "sup dawg" while you hate "yo dawg".
Legally Blonde
yeah, but it'd be totally silent....exactly what a ninja needs
kind of like "a nod is as good as a wink to a blind horse."
Because they, and I quote, "didn't come from no monkeys."
I prefer the Mass Effect soundtrack.
Katrina's prints weren't on the gun. Good luck getting a conviction.
Spider-Man 2 and 3. I thought they were really meh. Although I really enjoyed some of the action sequences in 2.
9000??!.. sigh.. oh, nevermind..
I don't think you posted this to the appropriate reddit. Try www.reddit.com/r/inappropriatebehavior? 
Am I supposed to know who "Xzibit" is?
&gt;Yes, it's a sorry state of affairs. The best thing you can do is working to elevate these people out of their idiocy, so that you can be justly proud together :) Wait, so why is it OK for you to be patriotic but not an American?
that's why we humanely seal their lower half with glue.
Didn't every Democrat gloat when violence in Iraq was reported?
Its not exactly an easy field to break into.
Stop personalizing. Johnself is saying that Israel receives a disproportionate amount of negative attention of Reddit based on its actions relative to those of other countries elsewhere *right now*, not in the past "6 decades." You can't argue that fact and call yourself a logical person.  And the typical retort to my comment is going to be "Well if my taxes are going to that country, hell, I have a right to pissed!" So I'll pre-empt that. You are attaching too much emotion to this. That's all. I find that lack of objectivity unsettling.
who seriously got a job designing that and is so closed off to the world that they completely missed the similarities. or do they really just think we are that stupid?
Oh, really?  http://www.google.com/search?hl=en&amp;q=bcm43  I hate this parental computer expert tone that's miles away from reality.
I didn't, might pick it up sometime.  Sounds quite a bit different from the movie (natch).
As usual the fuckheads at the dailykos are too stupid to read the Constitution. Not that leftists give a rats ass about the Constitution anyway. It is clear that the terms were not met.  Section 3 - Treason Note   "Treason against the United States, shall consist only in levying War against them, or in adhering to their Enemies, giving them Aid and Comfort. No Person shall be convicted of Treason unless on the Testimony of two Witnesses to the same overt Act, or on Confession in open Court." "The Congress shall have power to declare the Punishment of Treason, but no Attainder of Treason shall work Corruption of Blood, or Forfeiture except during the Life of the Person attainted."   http://www.usconstitution.net/const.html#A3Sec3
A whole new meaning for the term 'too soon'.
Not really. Their ammunition is remnants of the Russian invasion, i.e. technology from decades ago. There are reports of Taliban using British-invasion-era muskets...
In germany, where i live, patients can apply for a machine like the Page Turner on page 16 of [this \(PDF file\)](http://www.gewa.se/english/catalouge/Engkat.pdf) catalogue or the "[Turny](http://www.ergomotix.com/docs/Turny.pdf)". Both can handle paperbacks and be controlled from a mouth controller. Health insurance will cover all costs. Also, there's an extensive free audio book library for disabled people.
Yeah, nothing like showing society that you are different by dressing **exactly** the same as the rest of the idiots that can't think for themselves.
IVAN LOOKS LOST OUT THERE
The MEGAPHONE is strong.
Seriously, I had expected more.
Upvoted for edits.  edit: punctuation.
this article?  Terrible headline.  He's not talking about "college" for all - which is a waste for those not academically inclined.  He's talking about training, skills, for all.  
Only one and a half hours before MrBabyMan on digg took it. [Awesome](http://digg.com/celebrity/Sup_dawg_I_heard_you_like_Twitter)
they are jerks that were opening an underground canal for use by a hydroelectric power plant. I thought you environuts were in favor of alternative clean energy?  and the sea kittens are fine.
i don't disagree, and would, as a matter of fact, go much, *much* farther...we have, to further our own comforts and entertainment, *allowed* certain malevolently-intentioned groups to manipulate and control and reduce us...to be fair, it has taken a long time for it to get this far...  none of that, however, takes away from the fact of that man and his *personal* responsibility for his heinous and atrocious actions and behaviour...  we all bear some responsibility and duty to the current state of our societies and cultures...and each of us is, ultimately, accountable for our actions...without this acknowledgement, these events will not only continue--they will be proliferate!...  and God-damn us all...
&gt; The hardest thing for me had been dealing with my sexuality as a teen...my parents are extremely conservative when it comes to dating/sex and they pretend like it doesn't even exist  I kind of have the same problem. As a teen it was not a problem because I just wasn't that interested anyway, being a loner and a late  bloomer. Now I'm in my 20s, and my parents won't accept that I could possibly have needs. They think I should just find some nice guy, ideally one without a lot of sexual experience, with a stable job, and only have sex after I get married, and then not too often because nice girls aren't supposed to like sex. Other than their conservative mores, my parents are actually pretty cool. I'm their only child.
Well, your points are noted. But it's not exactly as if we can do experiments on this, considering the ethical implications.  On the other hand, police themselves serve as just another example of the same phenomenon, do they not?
 So... do you listen to Limbaugh on a regular basis, then?  He's playing to resentment junkies and the fringes of the hatred crowd. 
it sucked...
I'm torn for a different reason. I would love to have a chance (and the ability hah) to beat the crap out of someone like that for kicking a shoe at me. But to that extent? Did she break up with him or something? Jeeze.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Py-7B0J9JnE
I thought Batman was the best superhero movie of all time.  Not many superhero movies take the time to develop the plot as TDK did.  Additionally, the acting and the cinematography was brilliant. Sadly, because the plot was complicated, the movie was long and probably bored the ADD generation.  Ironman on the other hand, was the exact opposite of TDK.  The plot was banal and the movie relied too much of CGI (although the CGI was superb).
&gt; Lord of the *fucking* rings.  Hobbit porn?
What is with the "ha"?
My entertainment and shitter dollars go to the NYT.  I read it for a laugh and then bring it to the john.   
yes, now let's go to McDonald's and get ourselves a big mac. 
You mean with wages for the middle class stagnating for the past 25 years, a massive deficit and worse to come? you are such a fool.
 He wouldn't be thought of as a bad person... He'd be seen as a little eccentric possibly... but as the article states: It would be a non issue
OMG! TEH BESTEST!!
Smart, manipulative, fat, fuck.
I agree with a lot of Obama's initiatives, but not sure what the point of this is. Clearly, not everyone is cut out for college, and if you dumb it down enough so everyone can get a college degree, it just devalues the diploma.  Maybe a better strategy is to make real improvements to our high school system, beefing up trade and technical programs for the non-college-bound, and aligning education goals with real-world needs.  I have nothing against making continuing education available for everyone, but wouldn't it be nice if everyone who graduates from a four-year high school enters the world with:  * literacy and broad familiarity with core academic subjects;  * basic personal finance skills;  * basic computer skills;  * a functional knowledge of civics;  * strong employment readiness skills;  * an understanding of the scientific method and critical thinking;  * preparedness for either college or some sort of trade.  I don't think such a curriculum would be too ambitious even for non-college-track students, and it should be possible to accomplish in four years. But as far as I can tell, public high schools are not succeeding on most of these fronts.
It's up to you what you do or don't do with your own hair.  Perhaps "meant" wasn't the best term to pick, but there is something to be said for the role of hair in upkeep of physical appearance. However, I have a pro-good hair bias for both men and women so you'll have to excuse me if I came off as seeing a larger purpose to it than there actually is.
Over the years, Republicans have used a strategy of "fake populism" to get people to vote against their own self interest. Joe the Plumber was one small example of this strategy. Something *really weird* is happening right now, because the Republicans have started to believe their own bullshit.  Have they forgotten that Joe was *their* creation?  He doesn't know any more about middle America than they do. edit: when I say Republicans, I'm referring exclusively to the political class, NOT the millions of regular Americans who voted Republican.
Deep and Intellectual. Would Die again. 5+
Transformers: very cool trailer, sucky, boring movie. The only non-boring scene in that whole movie is the Megan Fox scene.
Where in Canada is this? In no way is it like this is in Ontario.
&gt; So you're going to put his family at risk by publishing that information?  Absolutely.
I respectfully disagree.  I mean, I agree that he's all the things you accuse him of, but he is terrifically relevant.  Look at the size of his audience.  I expect he's very influential among a significant portion of the GOP base and perhaps among their politicians.  As Sun Tzu said:  It is said that if you know your enemies and know yourself, you will not be imperiled in a hundred battles; if you do not know your enemies but do know yourself, you will win one and lose one; if you do not know your enemies nor yourself, you will be imperiled in every single battle.
This site smacks of Lenin, Stalin, Hitler, Mao and the rest of the murdering crowd.
We don't even have proof that Alex Jones actually reported it.  However, so far I've come up with this:  Calvin Jenks was the first of 69 American law enforcement officers shot and killed during 2007,  based on preliminary information received by the National Law Enforcement Officers Memorial  Fund (NLEOMF).  http://www.google.com/url?sa=t&amp;source=web&amp;ct=res&amp;cd=2&amp;url=http%3A%2F%2Fwww.ntctroopers.com%2Fpdf%2Fnews20080204.pdf&amp;ei=zNGpSbuCB4GEsQPV-dT1Dw&amp;usg=AFQjCNEm_2B1IgDET4GG04Fvu0Gvo5JM0w&amp;sig2=HkoWlMQJlyRR0aePt6huGQ  I doubt well over 50% were in Florida.
The other aspect is, with Fascist w. bush out of office, the tenor and tone of the discussion has changed.   Many of us are old enough to have kids, and we ***don't*** want them given a permanent criminal record for possession of a plant.  The benefits are becoming widely known, and the only voices against legalization are people who profit from the prohibition, or people who have no experience, nor any friends with any experience with Cannabis.  Fer Cripes sake, George Washington and Thomas Jefferson grew it as a crop, and Lincoln said a pipe full of sweet hemp while rocking in his chair on the front porch was one of his favorite things.  I think people are starting to equate Cannabis prohibition with the liquor prohibition, especially now that Mexico is about to implode from the strain imposed by our drug war.
shit just like your mouth
Please, do go ahead and tell us all about your concept of human nature.
Because the fear mongering right wing nuts twisted the definition of patriotic to something meaningless or ugly, and often used the flag to do it, as in "if you aren't waving a flag, or wearing a flag pin, you aren't patriotic", so often the flag waiving in America could qualify as "tasteless".  And exactly right, the Danes' pride in waving a flag is likely different than the "tasteless flag waiving" prevalent in America.
OLAF IS *DOMINATING* THE RACE
I think. And only comes circumsized
I guess you don't like the premise under which our country was founded; I guess they were dumasses, too. And, did Senator McCarthy do the right thing? Rush doesnt just disagree, he agitates and hides behind his legion of lemmings. I would nominate his fat ass for the Hermann Goehring award. Seems like I remember George(Alfred E. Neuman) Bush claiming everyone who didnt get on board was siding with the terrorists. Hypocracy to the max. 
Children of Men
In defense of the USA in particular, it greatly helps to have a mostly homogenous society.  You put a bunch of people together from different backgrounds, regardless of religion, and you're going to have problems.  That's why it is hard to compare US crime rates to most anywhere else in the world.
I remember being 9 and having to jump out of the second level window just to tunnel a way to the door.   We lived about an hour north of Winterpeg.
Implying that he deserves to be the victim of violence is pretty lame. In our country you have the right to be wrong and an idiot.
And if there is still anyone hot for that Hilton stick, [a recent likeness.](http://www.scifi-universe.com/upload/galeries/images_film/darkcrystal/skeksis.jpg)
&gt; "The" having a gender dependent spelling is the worst idea ever  Worse than not having words for "yes" and "no"?
All businesses trade on trust. But insurance companies and banks trade on "last man standing" principle. That after all is accounted for, these institutions are run conservatively and will be the last to fail. This also presupposes that the companies activities are well-understood by members of the community, not by their finance department. 
It could on purpose, some sort of viral marketing campaign maybe.
JAKE SCORES A FIRST PLACE **KNOCK**OUT
I can hear the politicians now:  We need a new Law - Placenta flushing has to become a felony!
&gt;  Studies have found that the best predictor of a startup's success is low CEO pay. $150,000 is the figure many cite. Above that, startups are more likely to fail, as the CEO lacks the proper motivation to turn the company into a success.   There's a lesson in there somewhere.
Geez, finally...Come Babylon.
Condoning this behavior? That attitude is both racist and imperialistic. Zimbabwe is a sovereign fucking country. Who the fuck is the US and UK to do anything about it? Are they the world's fucking police? 
I cop that gets killed. His entrails splattered across his families' faces. His corpse shoved into a septic tank for a taco bell.  I hope he fucking dies - I hope he fucking dies.
Most weapons are programmed with fewer hacks. :)
I'm sorry ... is it me or did you just veer completely off topic here? And maybe it's my lack of exposure to US media that just made me google "Kelly Nolan" since it didn't ring a bell at all ... but I got even more confused when I read that she was victim of a homicide and not prosecuted for one ...
 He's in the resentment business... all of them are, it's something of a tradition with the furthest reaches of the Right. It's a short distance from there to the hatred business, a very short distance.
This was the best distillation of this issue I've yet to read. Thank you.
many a day was spent on the megadrive playing roadrash when I was a kid. 
Funny, you are describing yourself you gob of cunt. I speak on the topic, you speak on how much of goddamn piece of shit you are.. I agree. you are trash shit. When you are looking for who doesn't contribute... look in the mirror at the dumb fucking cunt troll piece of shit asshole loser motherfucker that is *you*...  call someone that cares... http://www.freegpsonline.com/
As well as the above, there are several other factors at work.  The anonymity of the internet allows people to express themselves in ways they would not normally. The culture of the atheism Reddit has become such that more intemperate language than you would find in general society is acceptable.  In some cases, there is a genuine anger present. This is due to injustices that religion is perceived to have caused. Being angry at an injustice is not a bad thing, as such - so long as the target of that anger is correct! There will often be disagreements among atheists about whether religion is the correct target.  In a rare few cases, there will be examples of hatred of religion. This is not surprising - like any other group, atheists are diverse. There are intellectuals among us, there are scientists. There are irrational atheists, and there are trolls. Most often posts from this extreme will end up being downvoted.
Thank you, Google.  So yeah, he's a nobody whose most important contribution to the world is appearing in a funny Internet meme. Hooray.
It's not like we choose the sanest most trustable people to become cops or something. Its easy to forget they're people like you and me, only thing different is they are in a position of undeserved power.
5 to 10 years is kinda pushing it. I mean, who would have thought BSG would be this good especially when it was first announced that they were remaking it? Most people scoffed at it. People who liked the original didn't like hearing about changes and people who didn't give a shit about the original heard it was cheesy so it was an uphill climb to acceptance. 
Am I seriously the only one who hated cloverfield?
And decrease overall energy consumption (more sleep).
Yeah... openly religious... then some people might think about weird cults.. but confessing to your co-worker that you believed in god after a few beers? Not really that "cultist"
Yeah I tend to be that way sometimes. I don't like it so much but I do fine.
Q: Why does the atheism Reddit seem to suffer from groupthink?
&gt; Then they smelled funny.  [This is why.](http://www.beautifulcervix.com/photos-of-cervix/)
knowledge is a detriment to becoming a police officer.
[Link](http://www.newscientist.com/article/dn16680-porn-in-the-usa-conservatives-are-biggest-consumers.html). It has been [all over reddit](http://www.reddit.com/search?q=porn+conservative&amp;t=week) today and yesterday.
Google has these mysterious stubs for RPCs based on PBs, but they never released the actual implementation. (Theres also an amusing diatribe by someone who thought that merely suggesting an API for implementing PB-based RPC was the worst idea in the world...)
I agree with you completely, but most people don't have time to cultivate a skill for their part time job. I was simply stating that the vast majority of jobs available for people with no skills in the 18-25 age range are mostly crap wage wise.
Lol falafel is not an Israeli dish (well at least not specifically Israeli, it can be found throughout the middle east) 
At least the American residents get paid some compensation for their house, and the town will get more business with the new highways. But these residents have to leave because they don't have the "proper permit." And an archaeological park? "Hey, look what I discovered, seems to be the remains of a children's playground about a year ago."
I think that metaphor applies to a lot more than just weed legalization these days.
Most of my friends didn't like it, which is what I thought filled the "everyone hate" quota. 
Life sucks.  I'm sad.  Good bye.    *Ernest Hemingway*
Yep, Ubuntu just works, except when it doesn't or when you wanted (aaah!!) Fedora.  I envision the day Ubuntu will be a more powerful brand than Linux.
Both the IRS and the Treasury are part of "The Government".  The federal reserve on the other hand is something else again.
This is an idiotic comment.  Bush had control of both houses of Congress.  Democrats were locked out of policy discussions.  It takes a real flat-earther to have the audacity to propose that the failure of one of the worst presidents in the history of the United States was, in fact, the fault of the Democrats.  You are a fool and are intellectually dishonest. Good luck in this world.
Based on what? If you can't adequately draw conclusions from a flawed study how can you draw conclusions from ... well, whatever people are trying to draw conclusions from?
Because the individual people in the organization that you were introduced to messed up your mind, doesn't mean anything about Christianity. People are abusive, Christianity is not. There are people who teach their children for the child's benefit, even when it comes to religion. Imagine that. Your experience may have been different, but thats not the way it always has to be.
This is the new cutting yourself apparently.
Well in the case of a nuclear reactor I don't see how you could move it in the first place, but yes, I imagine coercion might be necessary if you tried to run off with all the food stocks or what have you.  What right do you have to take something that is the culmination of the effort of many and possibly necessary for their survival?  I understand where you are coming from, but you can't work with others and claim ownership over everything simultaneously. You can't have it both ways - you either have to be totally autonomous or accept the fact that you can't just seize everything at a whim.  However, that is not to say that you shouldn't be able to lay claim to ownership over the tools that you personally use to make your living - but as was previously stated I cannot really personally speak for hypothetical future anarchist societies.
Hey, he doesn't like Sup Dawg, but he didn't say anything about Yo Dawg
how do you prove that you were in relationship for 2 years??
Avatar?
Sorry I must disagree. The meme has a life on its own, and (most of the time) it's bigger than its creator.
Medium-rare, if the cook has any sense.  I mean, THEY NEED TO DO WAY INSTAIN MEDIUM-RARE.
Exactly.  This will continue until a common goal appears that supersedes the desire for power and wealth.  Namely, survival.  I think the current mess we are in could have a cleansing effect and remove the asshats currently in office.  If things get REALLY bad, there might not be any profit in being an elected official and we might get people who actually give a shit about the welfare of the state and people. 
Wooohooo Gator Nation.
One of my all time favorites.  "DIDN'T I WARN YOU?!?"  "THAT'S THAT!!!"
Hitler's Birthday, Anniversary of Columbine, great day to celebrate the thing most of these people do every single day of their college lives. 
I literally was obsessed with the Matrix series in high school. I didnt wear clothes, talk or anything or have posters, but i watched all the movies (including animatrix) end on end. If i had to eat, or goto a friends house, i would pause the movie and continue when i returned. when it was done, i would put in the next film, etc. constantly. there was something about the depth of the story, what was unsaid or unanswered, that really made my brain go into overdrive. also, they were fucking cool movies. The second and third were shot with the same style while the first was its own style. more green throughout the matrix in the other two whereas the first was more whites and greys it seemed.
I had no idea reading hurried the coming of spring! 
Hence the modifier.. ***SOME PEOPLE***  inferring most will not be able to.
&gt; he told us off in a very cool manner though  Not really.
She kicked her shoe at him. He probably did that as an act of "self defense."
Tabloids make awesome Reddit posts. Never let the truth get in the way of a good story.
Warning: Previous comment may contain spoilers.
Anyone know what kind of airbrush he uses? That stuff is friggin' amazing.
Bornography (n.): Graphic pictures or videos depicting a woman's vagina while a baby is exiting it.
What about Broken Arrow? I must have seen that 20 times on cable tv and loved it as a kid. Now I realise it's hilariously crap, but the nostalgia value is still there.
I'm pretty sure either party would have failed.  The failure is inevitable. What I care about is how well we prune government afterwords.
Behind most legends there is often some truth, and the bible is a great repository of legends that were prevalent over the history of it's writing. What the article is saying is that this may be the source of those legends and perhaps even a significant point in time where precursors to religions like Judaism (and thus Christianity and Islam) were formed. 
More pointless activist legislation from Dr. Ron Paul.  Never will pass and never will get out of the committee.  He introduces these things and then issues a press-release to inflate his ego.
The best in professional speakers and entertainers!
bravo, sir, bravo
They should learn how to edit. It should be a 5 second clip but instead they show an extra 50 seconds of magnets doing nothing. Watching a bunch of magnets lying on the floor is worse than watching paint dry.
Now I don't want one thanks amazon, I will just use bit torrent to download audio books instead of buying ebooks on your kindle. 
I'm gonna have to say... Idaho?
Ironman.  Besides the CGI, it's complete shit.
[My comment in another (duplicate) submission of this story.](http://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/8102g/surveillance_video_released_in_an_assault_case/c07y8be)
I think the truly amazing thing was it was shot by a tiny DSLR.
You may want to visit your OB/GYN for that.
nicely done
I'm interested in doing community service around the world (really I don't care where it is, I'll go anywhere) but can't afford some of the programs I've seen. They want me to pay $4000 to do a bunch of work for them? Get real.  The Peace Corps seems like a good solution, but 27 months is way too long for me. I was thinking closer to 3-6 months. Does anyone know of something like this?
funny, i downvoted for the godawful noise in the video.
the assertion that immigration doesnt' cost the state money is patently false. With believing you *don't* cost money you can only indicate a *blissful unawareness of reality* and history and.. state budgets and federal budgets.  The assumption that an incoming immigrant has the same right to the usage of the land as someone born there that has paid their taxes ...   is patently retarded.
Paul and Paul 2012!! 
That doesn't mean they watch more porn than everyone else.  They're just doing the "moral" thing and paying for internet porn.
A: This is partly because there are relatively few new and original ideas on the subject. Politics, news, science, humour - they all change fairly frequently. New ideas, and things which atheists will disagree about, are few and far between. The majority of stories of interest are about subjects which most atheists will agree on. This leads to the appearance of groupthink.
Everybody with the 'sup dawg' shit can tweet back @mrxtothaz yo dawg, i herd you liek cars
No need to.  All I have to do is direct you to read the magnificent Steven Pinker on his The Blank Slate book, so you learn the various programs that come built-in in the human brain at birth.  I don't mean to poop on Proudhon, Kant, Locke, Tucker or Marx, but they didn't have the benefit of modern psychology and neurology, so they were bound to reach the wrong conclusions simply to a lack of evidence.  On the Marx thing: it's pretty clear that what he saw as institutionalized injustice (property, capital) was really the evil effects of violent coercion.  Take a look at his philosophy, and you'll see it's a fool's errand, because he's trying to erase the concept of "what's mine is mine" from the world... and going against human nature is just bonkers.  If your system works *against* human nature, then it's not a good system at all.
I've been messing around with gearman and rabbitmq, I would be using json/thrift/protobuf over that.  The twisted amqp client even has thrift rpc support...  As for protobuf rpc, you can do it, but google hasn't released code for it, just stubs.  There are a couple of implementations already though.  One thing I haven't worked out with thrift(or protobuf) yet is how you are supposed to layout your code.  You have the same thing they used in their examples:  &gt; $:.push('../gen-rb')  but there has to be a cleaner way to integrate the generated code in a project.
&gt; What the president said during the campaign, you'll be surprised to know, will be consistent with what we'll be doing in law enforcement  I am ashamed that he even had to explain that the president would follow through on campaign promises. 
There is a difference between a blanket defense of currently existing property relationships (as it seems you would propose) and defending the right to ownership based on use.  What you propose is not anarchism but minarchism - the violent arm of the law will always be necessary to protect your property from those that rent from you, your factory from your workers, etc.
I love the word sensual.  It makes things less porny. :)
:)
I believe kanuk is making a mockery of [this](http://www.reddit.com/r/Equality/comments/80vu4/its_nice_how_the_female_alien_is_nude_as_she/) post.  He's pretty much saying: *"HAHA, I CAN MISCONSTRUE SIMPLE THINGS FOR INANE REASONS TOO! TAKE THAT!"*
I think it's especially cute when he puts the diseases in her mouth. 
I'm never sarcastic.
[Here you go!](http://www.thedailyshow.com/video/index.jhtml?videoId=187570&amp;title=the-stupid-vote)
Except for 3, maybe 4 (rough romance) these all sound like they should be in Lance Bass' favorites. I won't be able to think of the Duke in the same light ever again, thanks Barfolomew.
If you don't want to submit something under your own "name", why not just create another account to do it? What would hiding the submitter accomplish?
Your parents have good taste.
Homes can be perfectly reasonable investments, if you buy for a reasonable cost and rent.  The problem isn't investments in housing - it's speculation in housing.  Buying because you think there is going to be a short term increase in value rather than as a long term source of stable income.
Wouldn't a screenshot have been sufficient?
A monitored alarm system is essentially a security alarm system that is connected to an alarm monitoring center. There are numerous benefits for installing a monitored home alarm system.
have they changed since the c2d e4300?  i was quite impressed with the fan on mine.
Dan Brown needs to capitalize on this shit
foreskin boots??
AOL and tangled weeds in the same comments. Amazing.
You don't smoke, do you?  Or if you do, it must be dirt. Unless we're smoking in a huge group, we blow through *maybe* a gram. A half a gram works for 2 people, I find, and a gram works for up to 4.  If you're blowing more than that smoking in a night, then you'd better be asking the other 15 people in the circle to throw down some.
'merican, not cockney.
1) 200 on a scratch off lottery ticket. 2) father's day gift basket promotiong the movie Big Daddy It had a few bottles of cologne, an electric shaver, a bucket, a tshirt, and boxers. 3) won 1st place at numerous policy debate competitions in high school. 
Good point. It's like jumping from water straight to a cask strength single malt.
His name is Robert Paulson.
One of my favorite games. To bad the closest thing to it now is GTA IV's Lost and the Damned. And you only use a wooden baseball bat in that..   EA was suppose to make a "next-gen" one ever since the GCN/PS2/XBOX days but it was canned I think. Here's hoping to they'll make one for this generation Wii/PS3/360 or next!
Consider subtlety and/or duplicity. Create your group to discuss and study the political and scientific foundation of human ethics, for example. It really means secular morality, but in innocuous terms that include academic words. Don't mention atheism or agnosticism and make no reference to religion. Give the group a long and boring name. Once approved, you can always change the name to something more descriptive that the group will prefer.
My wife was though
Personally the concept of a "god" to me is impossible. My definition for gods/anything supernatural is that those things exist outside of our *current* understanding of the natural universal laws. If such a thing as a god was eventually found, I think that after some study, we would attain a state where we could describe the natural laws governing the existence and functions of this god -- at which point the being would no longer be a god, but merely something else governed by some internally consistent system.  What disturbd has said in a sibling post is not enough evidence for me -- just because we couldn't explain how some ancient 2,000 year old text "predicts" the future doesn't mean that the text or the creators of the text don't function under the same physical framework of the universe.
In our day and age, you can no longer beat your children. So if a teenager acts out, the only recourse is criminal justice: juvinile hall.  There's no way to keep it "under the covers" unless you're willing to essentially have no punishment for the child except your growing disapproval and ittractability.
Need more water; will distill blood. 
&gt; an club
I can't believe I made it through 8 minutes of that retarded drivel before closing the tab. That's what passes for wit among conservatives? No wonder there aren't any (intentional) conservative comedians.
I would see Abraham Lincoln vs Zombies.  Just imagine it - Lincoln killing Washington.
I actually didnt think The Happening was that bad. I watched it when it released on video, and after seeing all his other movies on opening day, i just happened not to be able to see this one in theatre. Anyway i read all the reviews, heard all the gripes and watched the movie anyway. If you went in knowing it was plants killing everyone, and that Mark Whalberg cant fucking act worth a shit, it wasnt bad at all.
I have confidence in the ability of the Republicans to alienate the voters in their districts.
chub79 vs. *every redditor ever*--Who will win?
My "objective" used to be a lie. I said I was looking for a challenging job where I could contribute and develop my skills. I want to develop my skills, but I don't care about contributing, and I really want an easy, grossly overpaid job. Now I either use a summary instead or just skip that section altogether.  I try not to lie on the rest of the resume, but I leave out certain details in order to present myself well. For example, I founded a startup and developed a web application, but I left out that it never got a single customer and that I spent most of my time sitting around. 
The fact that she complied to all of this shows that she isn't completely innocent.
That'll teach him.
&gt;They should be required by law to publish in open-access journals.  They should *desire* to publish in open-access journals. A law is the wrong approach. It's too heavy handed, and poorly worded law might either rule out collections of essays into books or lead to people only publishing in short "books" of original essays that come out every couple months.
A tripfag uses a name instead of the famed "Anonymous" on 4chan.  However, that's just a namefag.  Tripfags effectively "register" their name by creating a tripcode.  It's looked down upon (mostly) in 4chan because a) You're not being anonymous, and thus are being cocky and self-important (I guess) and b) You're not letting people pull DISREGARD THAT, I SUCK COCKS on you.
1000 Island has more stuff in it. Thousand Island dressing is a salad dressing (a variant of Russian dressing), commonly made of mayonnaise, ketchup, and finely chopped vegetables, most often pickles, onions, bell peppers, and green olives; chopped hard-boiled egg is also common.  The dressing is used both in salads and burgers and as a sauce on sandwiches, especially in fast-food restaurants. It tastes (and appears to be) very similar to fry sauce (called burger sauce in the UK), a 'simpler' version of thousand island dressing commonly used in fast food outlets. Fry sauce is made from similar ingredients: generally tomato ketchup and mayonnaise.
Open source needs more value crystalization for developers.
oh great
He's hell-bent on making more than $250k so he can complain about his taxes.
I see no replies above you. I am viewing in 'sort by: new' mode. :P
Those sims just seem to select for the more centrist guy a bit more strongly than approval or condorcet. Also, IIRC, under strategic voting/tactical voting/whichever the term was, I seem to recall it being shown that borda reduces to approval, so may as well just go for approval (which is my personal preference, actually. If for no other reason than it seems to produce almost the same results as the Condorcet method shown here, while being hardly more complex than basic plurality)
NO one steals a saber-toothed seal's bukkit.
why isn't this being discovered?
Experience?
Fuck me. Downvoted.
No kidding, the fact that we should be "surprised to know" is disgusting.  Welcome to opposite world.
Same thing.
Please, no one is arguing that individuals are born with a blank slate, but there is just as much evidence of cooperation in human behavior as there is in competition.  You can argue against socialism but saying that it doesn't jive with human nature is just laziness.  edit: socialists don't necessarily deny property but deny the right of capitalists to derive their livelihood from the labor of the working class.  get your facts straight.  see mutualism, for example.
thanks for the warning... I wont! 
... says the Daily Mail.
what a complete idiot...
I believe Unbreakable was HIGHLY underrated. If it came out at the height of the superhero/comicbook craze, i bet it would have done better.
Is that because they showed it in the first 20 seconds?
Don't feed the trolls!
A seam is where two pieces of fabric have been joined together.
You are an idiot.  First of all, the NAZI influence after the fall of the Third Reich is in your face. Research "Project Paperclip."  (I know that's hard for you, you want to be misinformed)  Fact: George W. Bush's grandfather, Prescott Bush, along with countless bankers within the United States funded the NAZI war machine directly.  Fact: The United States preemptively invaded another nation on complete lies and disinformation. Seriously, try thinking.Do I have to spell it out for you?  Fact: The United States was the number one beneficiary of the advance war technologies advanced by the NAZI war machine after WWII.  Fact: National Socialism in Germany involved the top of the Private sector and public sector uniting, making everything federalized for mass military and economic efficiency. Sound familiar?  and I can go on and on and on and on and on and on.  "It will make the world a better place." Get the fuck out of here with your stupid idealism BS, you're obviously very young and dumb to say something so meaningless. Summarizes your entire post. And who are "you guys?"  I'm just one person. Are you trying to group me with other people that know you're a little slow?  you're a fucking clown, you're talking to a superior who actually studies this shit.   And by the way, your name is kingcarot, I don't think you are in any place to call anyone retarded.   Your fake patriotism is a wall from accepting what's staring you right in the face: you don't live in a 'democracy.'  You're probably not worth the time, this is probably a case where I'm writing to someone so dumb that this post will go completely over his/her head. So I expect another juvenile response.  Seriously, next time you make a comment, read it over and think to yourself, 'is what I'm saying here retarded?'
"My wife and I were happy for 20 years. Then we met."
Which part of r/programming do you not understand??
Don't be a heterofag.
When you cannot even question something, that is Dark Ages thinking. So yes, it's very different. I think we had enough of that with the Catholic church. This is barbaric and stupid. Quite frankly, hate speech laws are ignorant as well. I am saying this as a gay man. If someone wants to voice their stupidity let them, if they take it beyond words, well they pay the consequences of their actions and there are enough laws to deal with those actions.
RIP.
Intrigued by your comment, I read nightfall (Short Story version). Needless to say I am thankful.  Now off to find the novel version.
&gt; They are only afraid of them if their parents tell them to.  Really? You think parents are telling their kids to be afraid of people without hands?  I think it's quite the opposite. We have a instinctual fear of people who appear different from us. That served us well in the wild, where members of other tribes had every incentive to eliminate you as competition for resources.  Acceptance of difference is something that needs to be learned. As a cultural value, it's only only existed for a relatively short period of time. I'm far from an expert in child development, so maybe having this woman on TV is a good way to teach it. Maybe it's too early for some kids. I don't know.
If they're Redditors it must be, "Oh, FSM!"
We are not at liberty to confirm nor deny these reports at this time. If such time arises when we can comment on this issue we will alert the media with a full statement.
oh god i looked it up and lets just say im not gonna sleep well tonight :(
You are mistaken, do a little research, you will find out it is indeed a private collection agency, and not part of the government.  Not a single employee of the IRS has a government ID number (which all government employees have)
Yup, the church serves it's purpose but it's not a particularly religious one these days.   The majority of people I know that call themselves Christian are just the Christening/Wedding/Funeral types. It's really just a convention hall for life changing events.
Brushing your teeth with an apple doesn't work.  He should have tried Bacon.
Who's been fondling priests?
I want one so I can go around saying "fuck you, I've got a panda."
Huh! Well this is going to be interesting.  You see, if the government stops raiding medical marijuana dispensers then it implicitly accepts that marijuana has a legitimate medicinal use. (Which it does, of course.) If it does that then it can't go on Schedule 1 anymore, as that is only for drugs with high addictive potential and no medical use.  So the implications of this could be pretty far-ranging.
Just *telling* people about Milgram in school wouldn't do anything. This gets to fundamental psychological issues with authority, that have probably developed from childhood.
using and addiction
And this story is passed down through vocal tradition over thousands of years, being embedded with speculation and superstition with every generation to the point where it's an integral part of folklore and makes part of the local religions.
What's truly horrifying is the defense used by Summers: "I honestly thought it was a police officer".  In other words, *I will do anything a police officer tells me to*.
How did *Randy Rides Alone* &amp; *Westward Ho* not make the list? 
Gr8 for the hate state!
"it"?
Or me.
Yeah, absolutely.  Why not have 1 house at the end of every street a chicken, egg, and vegetable producer.  Would be awesome.
Wow.  She was originally in custody for taking her mom's car without permission.  How subversive.  More info on the case [here](http://blog.seattlepi.nwsource.com/seattle911/archives/163025.asp).
OMG that one is even worse... this is this idiot's "art"? dear jesus, take us now...
the combination lock coat is awesome!
Il presidente dell’Italia dei Diritti: “Un’inutile carnevalata”    Roma - “Oggi possiamo anche accettare questa carnevalata delle ‘ronde rosa’, ma da domani bisogna cominciare a guardare umilmente la pura realtà ed evitare di offuscare la vista dei cittadini con fumose esternazioni propagandistiche”.  Questo il commento a caldo di Antonello De Pierro, presidente del movimento Italia dei Diritti, alle cosiddette ‘ronde rosa’, che ieri hanno visto impegnate alcune donne nel quartiere Eur di Roma su iniziativa de La Destra. Obiettivo dichiarato, salvaguardare la sicurezza sul territorio.   A questo proposito, il presidente dell’Italia dei Diritti afferma: “Capisco che il folclore fa sempre un certo effetto sulla massa, ma ciò conduce in una dimensione onirica, non risolvendo affatto i problemi. Vero è che la Costituzione, nonché la legge 121/81, prevede una fattiva collaborazione dei cittadini, ma non intesa come una semi-sostituzione di chi è deputato a svolgere certi compiti per cui è stato addestrato. Il codice penale prevede anche l’arresto da parte dei privati, ma penso che le statistiche siano molto scarne in questo senso”.   Per quanto riguarda l’efficacia dell’iniziativa, De Pierro asserisce con certezza: “Le ronde non fanno altro, come gli uomini dell’esercito, magari in tuta mimetica, che accrescere il senso di insicurezza della gente e far maturare, inconsciamente, nelle menti dei cittadini, un senso di giustizia fai-da-te. Questi provvedimenti, attuati tra l’altro in maniera alquanto confusa, non riescono a nascondere gravi falle nell’attuale gestione governativa e amministrativa. Non si può pensare di colmare ingenti tagli al comparto sicurezza, o la soppressione di posti di polizia fondamentali in chiave logistica, con rimedi inutili come questo. Per il teatro ci sono i luoghi deputati - ironizza il presidente dell’Italia dei Diritti - la gente in strada vuole la concretezza e quindi le divise delle forze di polizia, con il senso di sicurezza che queste ultime apportano”.  Antonello De Pierro continua poi la sua riflessione con tali parole: “Non riusciamo ad accettare che contribuiscano in termini di prevenzione e soppressione dei reati alcuni pregiudicati che bellamente occupano alcuni scranni del Parlamento. A questo proposito, credo che le loro condanne definitive non consentano loro di legiferare in tali materia”.   L’Italia dei Diritti, nella persona del suo presidente, chiede infine di rivedere il piano sulla sicurezza, incrementando la presenza di poliziotti sul territorio, dando incentivi agli appartenenti alle forze dell’ordine per interventi fuori dal servizio e recuperando unità operative andando ad attingere negli uffici burocratici dei corpi stessi. Secondo De Pierro, infatti: “Troppo spesso risiedono in essi i figli o gli amici degli amici. E’ quasi matematicamente impossibile che in una città come Roma, nel luogo in cui si consuma un reato, non ci sia un poliziotto, un carabiniere, un finanziere, un agente di polizia penitenziaria o delle guardie forestali, in servizio o in borghese. Infatti, spesso, molti di essi, o per mancanza dell’addestramento necessario, o per scarsa motivazione, evitano di intervenire se non proprio costretti dalle circostanze”.   
must be cause they killed rosencrantz and guildenstern
Ha! I like that you answered for the other guy, and didn't really read what I wrote. I said it's not absolute, but it is evidence.  And, to answer you, we accept the good, we should accept the bad, as well. 
LOL!
The British have historically used their teeth to demoralize invading armies, but that doesn't mean they're not teeth.
I can be a troll simply by reading an article? Most sites require userid for posting, but reading???? Damn it's getting easy to troll. I was unaware that reading an article could hurt my open-mindedness. Glad there was a sign-in wall to protect me.
Not much evidence of a planned rant there. 
We'll do almost anything to get spring here more quickly.   (Prime example of cabin fever...spending too much time online, and not really paying enough attention to what you write.)  
well, it's already free here in Finland.
Really? I would have guessed that their preferred drink was something that had caffeine.
I work in higher education (or at least we like to call ourselves higher!).  Our governor is talking about severe budget cuts that will shrink the efforts at many of our state colleges and state offices.  When I suggested recently at our college about the economic wisdom of going 'open source' (even just to replace our "Office" software so that it is Open...) I may as well have been speaking a foreign language.  Imagine the cost savings at a small place that has 400 computers. Then imagine it at a place that has 4000 (or all the places across the state, including state business offices etc.)  What will it take?
SWE-DEN! SWE-DEN! SWE-DEN! SWE-DEN!
this goes in entertainment.
The time between when you're allowed to post is based on your Karma. I have to wait something like 8 minutes.
* adds Phazon also because its close to my gaming name, Phaizonyx.
Is it possible that instead of there actually being that big of a difference in what problems there are in schools, our society's perceptions of what is a problem has drastically changed.
I gave up after the second episode. In the first two she played a hooker twice and a victim of child abuse. This is not the way to build a strong and interesting character.
Odd, I can get one at 6%... until a few months ago I could get one at 8 or 9%.
It had a lot of common themes with 1984, no doubt, as well as most dystopian literatures like Ayn Rand's stuff-- which I love.  It's not so much the themes that got me, it was the cinematography and storytelling. Anything involving gun-kata was pretty much orgasmic to my eyes. 
What? No Talmud?
Daaamn, those poor vegetarians really got issues. I hope someone finds a cure.
What's that? I can't hear you from your high horse.   Douchebag.
So what evolutionary force makes kids afraid of monsters? It's often said that humans have an inborn fear of things that are *almost* human, called the [uncanny valley](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Uncanny_valley).  There are two theorized explanations. The first is that almost-human "monsters" remind us of corpses or humans that are sick. Staying away from them protects us if whatever they had is communicable.  The other is that it keeps us away from other groups that are our genetic competitors. Wikipedia attributes it to interspecies competition, but I think it makes just as much sense for intraspecies competition. The foundation of racism is our genetic tribalism. Our close relatives, who look like us, share genes with us and therefore have an incentive to keep us alive. Unrelated tribes on the other hand are just competition for resources. Eliminating them benefits your own survival and vice-versa. Consequently, a wild human would have every reason to fear strange-looking people.  But just because it's an inborn instinct doesn't mean we shouldn't try to overcome it. We should teach kids to be more accepting of people who are different. Is this the right way and the right time in the kids' development to do it? I don't know.
I think he's probably a well-meaning guy, but wherever the guy goes he get completely outwitted by just about everyone else. He got outwitted by Harper in the PC-Alliance fiasco, and got outwitted by his then-girlfriend (Belinda Stronach) who left him *and* the Conservative Party for a front-bench seat in the last Liberal government.  The guy's such a Dudley Do-Right figure it's surprising anyone else takes him seriously, to be frank.
Sounds fun.
A 1-lb bag of ice!  Harvested by the hardworking penguins of Antarctica, this ice is not only clean &amp; tasty, it's cold!  Ice, from the makers of Water.
Sup dawg, I heard you like putting yo dawgs in your sup dawgs so you can yo dog while you sup dawg?
Oh, my bad.  Put a warning.
I say we organize events against [BritishEnglishPolice](http://www.reddit.com/user/BritishEnglishPolice/)!  Who's with me?!
I think it was the boys with the girls that were doing most of the damage. 
Instead why not just comment male or female.
I had no idea what this referred to. I haven't watched TV in about 7 years.
[Gun Kata](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gun_Kata)  I'm sure anyone who's fired a gun will tell me that it's an impractical method of fighting... but damn it looks bad-ass.
Million? [Looks to me like the main reddit only has ~100k users](http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com)
&gt; There is a difference between a blanket defense of currently existing property relationships (as it seems you would propose) and defending the right to ownership based on use.  I am not doing either of those.  It is clear that much of the currently existing property was illegitimately obtained.  It is also clear that your right to your property does NOT STEM from your use, but rather from your first occupancy or posterior transference by the first occupant.  &gt; What you propose is not anarchism but minarchism - the violent arm of the law will always be necessary to protect your property from those that rent from you, your factory from your workers, etc.  Not true.  I propose a market of laws and a market of defense.  Law is but only ONE way of achieving social order, personal protection and property protection.  It is not my fault that you did not know that, but now that you know, you can ask me more if you want to learn.
I think he was just pointing out it's strange, for such a nonbelieving culture. I'm here in Portland, probably one of the cities with a slightly higher abudnacne of nonbelievers in the US. There certainly aren't any church bells ringing all over downtown and nobody I know went through confirmation, etc.  I would intuitively expect a city in Scandanavia be more like Portland than say, someplace in South Carolina.  The whole idea that they go to church but aren't religious is totally weird to me. Here in the US, you're likely to know religous people that don't go to church anymore, but the opposite is pretty strange (to me).
I think we need to consult first with everyone's favorite [saber-toothed Mythbuster](http://ui29.gamespot.com/156/mythwalrus_2.jpg).
No way. Unless they are running very special software (which costs money, or at least time if it is Open Source, to develop) that limits what they can see, kids will spend all of their classes surfing the net.   I know you want kids to be able to use computers, but that isn't the way. Maybe some sort of remote clicker question and answer system is a better solution.  
But more people also equals more work being done. The prices went up because the power decided they would. Pressure comes not from the amount of people, but rather from the lack of land that the people have access to. Never forget about the value of land.
**And** this righteous condemnation of a man having an affair came from a man *having an affair.* It's been a long time since the Republicans haven't proven themselves to be hypocrites, but at least they can say they're consistent about it.
How bought just putting all the bully's in one school and the rest in another?
"Yo dawg, we heard you like watching videos" much?
I think it was a sitcom in the 90's.
I agree if you on average only turn it on a couple times a day. More than that and you are stressing the components with hot/cold/on/off cycles far more than you ever would with letting it run 24/7. If you suggest anything else then you know nothing about electronics manufacturing and MTBF. So now I am modding you down.
mine too. I bet his are chipped to pieces after that
I'll admit it, I had to look up what a sacrum is.
HIV is a member of a family of viruses, retroviridae (sp?), which use the protein reverse transcriptase to 'back-transcribe' RNA into DNA.  It has nothing to do with immune cell preference.
We should, then we can just talk about the niggers.
WE'LL DO IT LIVE!  Hm somehow it doesn't seem to work...
yeah, at least he didn't tase her
I had a friend that died 10 years ago from hearing that joke too many fucking times.
Bad times to be a guy.
i said in a few posts back that i always thought Tom greene was pretty funny, and he didnt cater to the fratboy/dumb humor crowd. Alot of his stuff was way witty, and original. I don't know what happened to his career, but I was a fan til the end :-/
Very ugly bikes  make up for their geekiness  with their storing ease
FML
Would those be the good cops who sit around and watch apathetically as the corrupt fucking pigs beat on people?
As a Pats fan I can't say I'm pleased.
These people are not Americans they are traiters! I hope someday we will see the government learn to work together for the good of the people and not for the good of their own personal agendas. But this will  never happen until we completely clean house in congress.
On weekdays I sometimes wake up before my alarm. Then I just lie there. Otherwise, I hit the snooze button as much as possible and just lie there. Finally, I get up out of bed. If I have time I eat breakfast. Then I brush my teeth and try to get to work on time.
Its only when a household have a birthday, although in the southern part of the country its with more national pride. Some say it have something to do with the battle at dybbøl banke in 1864 and the liberation of that part of the country from Germany in 1920.  We don't have a flag on every porch and generally aren't that nationalistic, unless if their are a vote on expanding the union. This have in time reduced somewhat, unfortunately.  I've never been in US, but the way you show patriotism, is very different from what I see around Denmark. 
Go four pages ahead from the original post...
I was taught that the germanic family of languages was completely different from the romance languages, which descended from Latin.  English is a mixture of both, which is why it's easy to speak a bit of it if you know any European language, but tough to master because of all the inconsistencies.  Take, for example, verb forms. In English we have both weak verms (indicate the preterit by a suffix: 'I smoke' / 'I smok**ed**') and strong verbs (preterite is indicated by a specific vowel change: 'I drink' / 'I dr**a**nk').  In French, there's no such thing as a "strong" verb (a germanic concept), so when you learn English in a French school, every verb is either "regular" (weak) or "irregular" (either weak or truly irregular like 'to be').  So they get pages of "irregular verbs" to learn off by heart when most of them are in fact regular, just not under any grammar rules they know. Learning lists of words like that sucks; most students lose interest and only remember a select few, what they really remember is that "English has tons of irregular verbs" which is complete bollocks.  Erm, this comment ended up a bit longer than I had planned. Sorry about that.
So this is the direction the Green Party is heading after Ralph Nader. Guess it goes with their anti-irradiation and depleted uranium stance. 
I'm rubber; you're glue.
Wait, what is this?
I never even notice which way I place them...
In the sense that everyone who has ever purchased at least a single CD, cassette, record or 8-track is a customer, then yes.  Yes they were.
Limbaugh is a zio-lap dog, nut sac, that i hate. But all he is saying is that he wants Obama's communist take over and any other non capitalist plan to fail.
oooh!!!
I update my definition of a personal god based on current science.  Anything that is unexplained is caused by my god.  Much like knowledge of an electron's location alters it, knowledge of the universe alters my god's power over it.  His name is Magic.
These clothes are way innovative... however, I do not approve of foreskin used in this way.
I think Reddit is more divided than some think.  A lot of Ron Paul supporters are still here and never liked Obama.  Makes me wish that Reddit had the comment feature Digg has where you can see the individual upvotes and downvotes per comment.
&gt; He learned from the very beginning...you always "help" a fellow officer.  Interesting, but flawed philosophy. The proper attitude:  &gt; [Narrated Anas:](http://www.usc.edu/schools/college/crcc/engagement/resources/texts/muslim/hadith/bukhari/085.sbt.html#009.085.084)   &gt; &gt; [Allah's Apostle said, "Help your brother whether he is an oppressor or an oppressed," A man said, "O Allah's Apostle! I will help him if he is oppressed, but if he is an oppressor, how shall I help him?" The Prophet said, "**By preventing him from oppressing (others)**, for that is how to help him." ](http://www.usc.edu/schools/college/crcc/engagement/resources/texts/muslim/hadith/bukhari/085.sbt.html#009.085.084)  In other words, had his fellow officers stepped in previously for much smaller incidents, or earlier in this particular one, this deputy -- and the police force -- would be better off...
Now what would be clever is if it was "Machine. Unexpectedly, I’d invented a Time"
We'll never admit to having bunkers stocked with several years worth of nonperishable food, medical supplies, ammunition and a large cache of high-power assault rifles.  The first rule of stockpiling is to not talk about your stockpile.
Only if "COMPLETELY SEPARATE" you mean "composed of".  A corporation is a bunch of people with money in, a bunch of employees, and a set of rules for interacting.  If you want to prevent corporations from influencing public policy, you better go after the FSF and EFF as well - after all, they're not people, they're just legal fictions.
I don't like that.
Some good advice here!
Any dog can attack anyone, don't ban the dog, fine or jail those who train their pits to be aggressive. This is yet another waste of a law.
It's probably Vancouver.  /Sarcasm
Jonathan Swift?
Do they have a 'To catch a prenatal predator?'  They should.
Never even heard of this meme.
OLD: There are references to most of these words all over the web, dating back to 2004...there is nothing recent about them.
yeah, michelle aint gonna be happy! ;-)
&gt;"We learnt on February 24 that another Sumatran tiger had been trapped and killed by villagers after it attacked two farmers on Sunday," WWF spokeswoman Syamsidar told AFP.  &gt;"This is the fourth tiger killed this month and we are concerned because it is a protected animal and an endangered species."  Next week: Indonesian hospitals overcrowded as "Stone Cold" Steve Austin and Dwayne "the Rock" Johnson begin their counter-offensive to save the tigers.
&gt;And if you're one of the few sane people that makes sense, no matter what your viewpoint, I'm not talking to you.  You're calling me an anti-Humanite for saying that insanely racist people I see here on reddit get me annoyed? And you got upvoted? I specifically said I'm not talking to people with different viewpoints, I'm talking to the racists that say shit like "Well, fuck the american jewish leaders, then and anyone following them." and get upvoted to 45 points. But to you, to claim that was a racist statement MUST mean that I agreed with the Gaza operation. That assumption in itself says a lot.   And another thing. To call Gaza a concentration camp is disgustingly ignorant. We both know what happened in Europe in the 40's and we both know that's not being attempted in Israel. You're trying to incite here, and it's working. You're also making the Holocaust irrelevant in your debasing attitude towards it. I call you an anti-Humanite for speaking that way. If you think I'm overreacting, you don't know the half of it. Six million people died then, and I don't give a fuck who you think you are, you don't call an operation that killed less than 1000 a damn Nazi operation. It's pitiful how little people respect others here. As for your Jewish friends, I'm sure their grandparents wouldn't like you using that terminology about Israel.   It's incitement, without excuse.  
I like how Dawkins in [this video](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qR_z85O0P2M&amp;feature=related) (around 42:00 mark) answers this question. He says that the atheistic/scientific explanation for the beginning of the universe states that order came from chaos -- the christian/religious explanation says that order came from order, which is many many times more difficult to believe. He did give a much better explanation for it than my summary :/  EDIT: Made a transcript of that part.  *However, when you ask what the alternative is, if the alternative being offered to what physicists now talk about,the big bang, a spontaneous singularity, if the alternative to that is divine intelligence, a creator, which would have to be complicated, statistically improbable, the very kind of thing that scientific theories like Darwinism seek to explain, then immediately we see however difficult and apparently inadequate the theory of the physicist's is, the theory of the theologians that the first cause was a complicated intelligence is even more difficult to accept. They are both difficult, but the theory of a cosmic intelligence is ever worse. What Darwinism does is raise our consciousness to the power of science, to explain the existence of complex things and intelligences and creative intelligences and above all things that are improbable, Darwinism explains how such entities come into existence from simple beginnings. However difficult those simple beginnings are to accept, they are easier to accept than complicated things -- complicated things come to existence late as a consequence of very many simple steps. God, if he exists, would have to be a very very complicated thing indeed so, to postulate a god as the beginning of the universe, is to shoot yourself in the foot since you are immediately postulating something far far more complicated than what you are trying to explain.*
Right, because ripping a piece of paper off is too hard for Grandma.  She's old, not stupid.
The first time I saw Kung Pow, i was expecting a totally different type of movie. I hated it. but then a friend of mine rented it, and i watched it with them, and we all had some laughs, and i acutally found it entertaining. then i saw it on TV on my own later and laughed my ass off several times. it totally grew on me and was really well done for alot Odekirk being greenscreened into all the shots
I was agreeing with your post until I saw your inane and overly broad generalization. You don't know what you're talking about.
That's what I thought
Screencap this shit with a title like "Only on Reddit".
Haha, I'm from Canada and living in Norway, I know how it is. :P
&gt;Plus there are plenty of places in America that are just as peaceful and crime-free as Denmark (some with larger populations than the entire country of Denmark).  Actually the US as a whole has a lower overall crime rate than Denmark.  Denmark has a crime rate of 92.8277 per 1,000 people while the US has a crime rate of 80.0645 per 1,000 people. Since I left home for college I've never lived anywhere in the US that even approaches the normal crime rate.  The current town I live in now is about half the national average.  Stats taken from [Nation Master](http://www.nationmaster.com/graph/cri_tot_cri_percap-crime-total-crimes-per-capita)
Several of you have mentioned the term "irreducible complexity" - but I'll just reply to you because you, for some reason, got the excess of up-votes. It is unfortunate that non-scientists or "pseudo-scientists" own this term. There is no reason, however, that this should be the case. Irreducible complexity simply means that something is at a level of complexity that when reduced is taken out of context or misunderstood. Creationists and others simply took a reasonable term and monopolized it with the ulterior motives that the author of this article is trying to describe.
Really?  George W. Bush makes an appearance?
When are YouTube comments ever not douchey?
If the user ID is hidden, people won't log out. If it's displayed, they'll notice it right away and wonder what's going on until they figure it out. Once they figure it out, they'll ignore it, until one day they see www.usbank.com http://www.somephishingsite.net asking for their usbank login information. With it hidden, they'd just see a box and are less likely to think twice about it.  Your username isn't really considered secure generally, anyway. They'll freely transmit that through unsecure e-mail, even if they won't do that with passwords.
Just one of many poor design decisions in the construction of Windows.
&gt; Please, no one is arguing that individuals are born with a blank slate  Good.  Very good.  Read the book to learn more.  And to have fun.  It is an amusing, eye-opening read.  If you want it, I can email it to you, no questions asked.  &gt; but there is just as much evidence of cooperation in human behavior as there is in competition.  Undoubtedly.  In fact there is MORE evidence of cooperation than of competition.  But competition is natural because people often have different approaches for the same end.  We humans are capable to cope with both.  What we are not capable to cope with (healthfully) is violence.  The current world state can be entirely ascribed to the exercise of violence by the state and their friends the powerful people who co-opt the state violence into serving their interests.  &gt; edit: socialists don't necessarily deny property but deny the right of capitalists to derive their livelihood from the labor of the working class. get your facts straight.  The problem with socialists is that, in order to enforce what they deny, they need violence.  Otherwise, how are you gonna make it so, e.g., I have $1000 and I want to voluntarily lend it to someone who wants to start a business and pay me back $1100?  But there is a certain streak of (self-styled?) socialist that in addition to that, also denies at least some property.
until it's dry?
I want' me one of those big ol' **Bubba** buckles.  
&gt;It is also clear that your right to your property does NOT STEM from your use, but rather from your first occupancy or posterior transference by the first occupant.  Is it though?  I mean, it could very well be true but I don't see how it is *clear* that this is a fact.  Anarchists have been debating these issues for a very long time - hardly seems clear to me.  A market of laws and defense is little different from uniform law.  What you propose is just a multitude of states existing to enforce the will of the wealthy instead of a solitary entity.
it was on the news the mroing a grill who over-cook three babbys. i am truely sorry for your lots.
"My skin is not my own" - to quote children of dune
&gt;re-unite  How did you ever come to that conclusion?  They were *and are* two quite separate parties.
He is going to wake up one day and wish he were on DB's with hot chicks instead of writing some nerdy book.  Wasted youth.
And here' I thought the WTF was the downed Jem Hadar spacecraft...  http://www2.odn.ne.jp/~hao27600/StarTrek/StarTrek19Jem.jpg#19Jem.jpg   http://img6.imageshack.us/img6/3567/85885252.jpg
Somehow the attack being shown as a series of still has a more dramatic effect than the video.
Whoever painted the rip-off LEFT OUT WINSTON. Fucking charlatan. 
I hate when people have a stupid gimmick that they use in every single comment
Maybe we've all been wrong about Rush. Maybe he's like Christian Bale's character in The Prestige. He's given his life, become fat, portrayed himself as a bigoted idiot, just so he can do the trick that makes him famous and makes people wonder.
Thanks strawman.  No points for you, however, because of the condescending "Pretty obvious". 
Right.  What I mean is, I don't see why this is an example of an anti-Obama video.
Upmodded for flaming RSS.
retared? I've never previously been tared. Can you explain how to hook up the KZ2 party? 
This. Sometimes for some silly reason it can be labelled w x l x h. If it's about a product well I'm sure the dude can work out that the longer side of the toolbox is the length.
I don't know if it is a myth, because I never had been in the middle of the amazon or any place like it, but batteries due to the heat and high humidity last way shorter than usual.   And outside of Brazil major cities, Internet Cafes are very slow for this kind of backup, you'll spend a day there to do it. Only do it for the photos you really want to keep. By the way, Internet cafes are called here by 'Lanhouse' and every city has at least one.   Don't worry about being mugged, just be discrete (use some kind of bag to carry it) and important: avoid to be lost (bring up a fully charged GPS always).   If you want to see nature take a look at this list http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Protected_areas_of_Brazil there are places like [Lençois Maranhenses](http://images.google.com/images?hl=en&amp;safe=off&amp;client=firefox-a&amp;rls=org.mozilla:en-US:official&amp;hs=quE&amp;ei=7dKpSeG5NODkmQfqwvDbDQ&amp;resnum=1&amp;q=Len%C3%A7ois%20Maranhenses&amp;um=1&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;sa=N&amp;tab=wi) or [fernando de noronha](http://images.google.com/images?um=1&amp;hl=en&amp;safe=off&amp;client=firefox-a&amp;rls=org.mozilla%3Aen-US%3Aofficial&amp;q=fernando+de+noronha&amp;btnG=Search+Images) that are fabulous. There is nothing really to see in the middle of the Amazon, its a neverending dark jungle. Traveling to the heart of it is like 6 hrs on a plane, with nothing to see besides the green ground and continuous rain. [Pantanal](http://images.google.com/images?um=1&amp;hl=en&amp;safe=off&amp;client=firefox-a&amp;rls=org.mozilla%3Aen-US%3Aofficial&amp;q=pantanal&amp;btnG=Search+Images) has a more exotic frame of the same wild life, but it can be only fully accessed by certain seasons. To see people, goto Salvador or Recife and Rio. Florianopolis is nice too. 
In your prefs there's an option:  don't show links after i've liked them
my question is, how many whales get circumcised to make one pair of boots?
In other words, creationists apparently never heard about the sun. Ya know, that giant ball of gas that constantly bombards the earth with new energy?
Very interesting. I note that I've only seen the "YO DAWG" variant popularized on reddit. Did reddit mutate this meme?
I actually never heard the watermelon thing before this. Interesting...  As for blacks liking fried chicken, I always heard it was because chickens were one of the only properties blacks were allowed to have in the south. So they would eat it a lot. Yeah, sounds stupid. But whatever.
One of my favorites.
&gt;But competition is natural because people often have different approaches for the same end.  Fallacy.  And any system of governance in which people live in close proximity to each other will have some violence present.  Even in your ideal free market there will still be thieves and murderers, and coercion and violence will be a necessity for your private law entities or whatever you call them to maintain order.
Dollhouse?
did anyone else go into their keyboard properties and change the character repeat rate?
I think it'll be pretty much like using public transport.
I have no credit card, I dislike spending money I don't have :)
I think the best thing would be to brick him up into an alcove a la The Cask of Amontillado! Starving to death would leave a long time to think about what you've done wrong (see video).
To pretend that Republicans are back-to-roots conservatives, comparing the tyranny of King George to the damage control of Barack Obama.  Funny thing, there's a lot less interest in this "tea party" movement than they'd like us to think.
Ron Paul wins in 2012. Mark my words.
If something large exhibits sufficient fail worthiness, it really ought to fail as rapidly and efficiently as possible.   "Too big to fail" is the most pathetic concept the world has ever encountered. Imagine if evolution operated under the same principle?... its a weak minded sham 
Funny, it doesn't *look* Irish.
The mind is willing, but the flesh is spongy and bruised!
Your right on that note, but it's pretty important to understand why most choose to be "Confirmed". In school we have a church-run preperation process for the Confirmation, which is a poorly thought out passege into adulthood. It is mandatory, and unless you're a person of a different religion, you go, unless your parents explicitly ask for you to be excused (which happens rarely).  Only one, in the two classes attending the preperations, believed in god. And everyone got Confirmed. I got confirmed because my parents didn't want to throw me a party (which involves presents, and usually a lot of money from family) if I didn't do it, even after I said I didn't believe in God. Having said that, my parents aren't religulous, it is simply tradition. My friends went through the same debate - same outcome.  In my eyes, religion in Denmark is as dead as the record industries business model, and churches are fighting to stay alive.  The church-bells ring each morning because it's 10 in the morning. It doesn't cost a fortune to run a hydrolic hammer, but most dont heed the call for mass :)   Churches are there because they're old and pretty, and we used to be a very religious country. Now, not so much.  We love talking about religion though, only it's always in a "what up with the religious influence on the US election"-kind of way. Some of you yanks scare the shit out of me.  I would rather talk about religion then run down the street naked.  A Dane, obviously :)
i don't hate movies; just people.
Yay for ignoring context!
RAAAAAAGGGGGGGGGGEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE!!!!!!!!! 
Precisely. In my college, we have ethernet cable  from room to room for up to 30 meters long. An eyesore, but definitely did the job. 
I want america to remain america and for Obama to fail to turn it into france and load my grandchildren with a ton a debt. I am not a Republican.
Like **indigoshift** said, at least you've actually written a book. I'm also taking a look at it. I like that you've put it under the Creative Commons, too :)
&gt; hunter-gatherer societies still had systems of supernatural belief  Yes, you're spot on. Daniel Dennett likes to call these the wild, undomesticated ancestors of religions. They are the simple organism memes that evolved into the complex religions.
Yea... and then I said to myself, ok the WTF tag has been justified now and I can expect really nice under water pics.... and then the last pic hit me.. WTF!!!
Looks like I guessed right. LOL
It's true.  And up until the last couple of elections, the enemies of America were winning.
I think if you believe what people are conditioned to repeat in front of strangers about their drug use, you will get a fucking *retarded* view of what the world thinks of pot.
So important to remember that you have to make money.  And a lesson taken from South Park to boot!  
Good lord, what idiots.   Are the blinders on and securely fastened?   Check.   Facts in the garbage can?   Check.  Creating more of a problem than it will prevent?   Check.
I disagree. I believe that The Pick of Destiny was his greatest work. Its one of the funniest movies ive ever seen. and his death scene in The Jackal is second to this.
He can't spell Filipino, so I doubt it. Seems to know about Wikipedia, just too dense to let any of it fucking soak in.
I think it's just that probably its target group had already seen the original one.
Remember when you last had a "real" Christmas tree?
Thanks! I love old advertisements. (And Super Metroid.)
&gt;  And any system of governance in which people live in close proximity to each other will have some violence present.  This is why I advocate NO system of governance, but voluntary relations between people.  &gt; Even in your ideal free market there will still be thieves and murderers, and coercion and violence will be a necessity for your private law entities or whatever you call them to maintain order.  Correct, but since that violence would be in self-defense or defense of property, it is perfectly legitimate and morally good.  You are not going to deny that a murderer shot and stopped in the course of his vile act is actually a GOOD thing, are you?
I would be planning something big... There's not much in this world that could make me want to induce physical physical harm on another human being and actually follow through, but this would be such an occasion. Given a decade or so to plan, there's absolutely no reason you should not get away with it either.
&gt; Xzibit sounds like he needs a fap.  FTFY
Lust and disappointment. 
I love this game, it feels fluid and spontaneous. Here's some game footage: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=TRsqid3SWs0
We don't go to church, unless there is a good reason. Usually because of celebration (Marriages, Births etc) or sorrow (Funerals). Also tourism and architecture are common reasons.
well put.
"The 2nd law of thermodynamics essentially says that an isolated system cannot flow from disorder to order"  You got it all wrong.  The second law of thermodynamics is an expression of the universal law of increasing entropy, stating that the entropy of an isolated system which is not in equilibrium will tend to increase over time, approaching a maximum value at equilibrium.
That's pretty sweet. I'm sure you could do that with some other consoles too. Those iMacs are pretty big.
&gt; When people make the transition from hunter-gathering to settled agriculture, their skeletons change - they temporarily grow smaller and less healthy as the human body adapts to a diet poorer in protein and a more wearisome lifestyle. Likewise, newly domesticated animals get scrawnier.   Says who? When horses are domesticated they almost always grow bigger as they drink cleaner worm-free water and generally live healthier lives. This is a tabloid article.
The next morning, the crew's family had excellent bacon
&gt;That was not the point. The point is they have no idea how consciousness works. Even a complete functional understanding of the brain would not change that.  First, you are assuming that consciousness actually exists. Second, prove your second sentence and you will have a point.  But you need to prove that.  Until then it remains conjecture.  I believe that if we could show the complete functional understanding of the brain, then we will understand consciousness -- either for what it is, or as illusion. You are basically saying "we don't understand something now, therefore we can never understand it". Obviously wrong.  
Obama's approval ratings will be in the shitter by summer. He is a Black Jimmy Carter. It's all rhetoric, no substance. He's only been in office a month and i can't stand the equivocating fool. And i'm a die hard liberal. Can't even imagine what the right wing thinks.
There is a joke in there somewhere.
I think that's a pretty safe assumption.
While I do think what he did is very impressive, but from an artistic standpoint, I don't really see the purpose of creating a photorealistic painting.
A toast!  I swear this whiskey has no whiskey in it...  ( ;
Looks like Quebec City last year. I remember snow drifts so bad you had to set your alarm at night to shovel off your car or it would be too much to do before work in the morning. 
Murderous cows get revenge. /world
Oh aren't they the same lovely people who were pouring French wine down the gutter five years ago?
The whole idea of a meme is that no one person can govern it. Your point is automatically nullified.
Yeah because guys in their 70's are really concerned about their self esteem. Stop projecting your own issues.
I think you're right, and that makes a lot of sense.  I would never say "nothing can be done" -- although I am definitely saying that "it's in the system."  Meaning that a systemic response -- such as you advocate here -- is the correct one.   I really just wrote this because I was annoyed by the knee-jerk "cops are fascist pigs" stuff that always shows up when this kind of horrible incident appears -- it feels too similar to a lynch mob.  
That picture of John and Caroline Kennedy dancing in the oval office was not taken the day before JFK was assassinated.  He was in Texas on the day prior to his assassination.  I call bullshit on the whole blog.
Huh? I'm pretty sure I've seen the term "closed" used to include closed to energy.  I know I've seen the second law stated in terms of "in a closed system blah blah blah..." which clearly only necessarally holds if "closed" includes energy, so...
Yes, that is a part of the reason the Danes have advanced to where they are. This is where the role of religion comes in. When people have what they perceive to be "differences", "Do unto others as you would have them do unto you" can change everything. Thats the point of Christianity and when most people do that, the religion becomes the way of life and not a separate ideology. Then you have a good society, and not a "religious" one. You end up with all behaving as the religion instructs and none talking about the religion.
Great reminder about the investment pros to buying acreage.
they're WATCHING YOU! they're sending you encoded message on CEREAL BOXES!
I liked the movie Con Air.   Now that was good.
There is always one hitler in every campaign. 
&gt;This is why I advocate NO system of governance, but voluntary relations between people.  What happens when I come and try to steal your shit?  How will roads be built? Even if there are a multitude and you call them private law entities, its still more-or-less government.  Also, defense of property does NOT equal self-defense.  It may be justified in some contexts, but it is simply not the same thing as self-defense.
Obama is a neoconservative Republican wet dream:  expanding the wars; continuing the renditions, wiretaps, and secret prisons; increasing the insanely huge Bush budgets --- and getting away with it because he's a black man with a "(D)" after his name.   
"Your bitterness is your weakness"  "Your faith in your bartender is yours"
Coka-Cola adds plutonium: hello Quantum!
Hot new post-apocalypse serial by Sandra Fowke
It's time's like these you just sit back and pretend *you* were being sarcastic.
I watched it while visiting in the UK. Definitely the perfect audience for the ending :)
They are, to a point.  Sadly it needs to go deeper.   I've found most of the good cops were the ones who never really wanted to be one.  But just gravitated to it.
With historical facts. Such as- it was really limited, and they encouraged leniency. And, they started the whole 'trial by jury' thing. And, people chose the religious courts over the state ones.  And, finally, because we've gotten past that, while so many haven't (Muslims, the media, etc).
It's interesting how we can see that by allowing themselves to be worked up over the "rich" white farmers, the people oz Zimbabwe allowed themselves to driven to poverty, starvation, and death. Yet, many of these same people can't see how they are doing the same thing to themselves by openly supporting "hate the rich" politics in the USA.
Amazing what a talented person can do with Photoshop.
Il presidente dell’Italia dei Diritti: “Un’inutile carnevalata”    Roma - “Oggi possiamo anche accettare questa carnevalata delle ‘ronde rosa’, ma da domani bisogna cominciare a guardare umilmente la pura realtà ed evitare di offuscare la vista dei cittadini con fumose esternazioni propagandistiche”.  Questo il commento a caldo di Antonello De Pierro, presidente del movimento Italia dei Diritti, alle cosiddette ‘ronde rosa’, che ieri hanno visto impegnate alcune donne nel quartiere Eur di Roma su iniziativa de La Destra. Obiettivo dichiarato, salvaguardare la sicurezza sul territorio.   A questo proposito, il presidente dell’Italia dei Diritti afferma: “Capisco che il folclore fa sempre un certo effetto sulla massa, ma ciò conduce in una dimensione onirica, non risolvendo affatto i problemi. Vero è che la Costituzione, nonché la legge 121/81, prevede una fattiva collaborazione dei cittadini, ma non intesa come una semi-sostituzione di chi è deputato a svolgere certi compiti per cui è stato addestrato. Il codice penale prevede anche l’arresto da parte dei privati, ma penso che le statistiche siano molto scarne in questo senso”.   Per quanto riguarda l’efficacia dell’iniziativa, De Pierro asserisce con certezza: “Le ronde non fanno altro, come gli uomini dell’esercito, magari in tuta mimetica, che accrescere il senso di insicurezza della gente e far maturare, inconsciamente, nelle menti dei cittadini, un senso di giustizia fai-da-te. Questi provvedimenti, attuati tra l’altro in maniera alquanto confusa, non riescono a nascondere gravi falle nell’attuale gestione governativa e amministrativa. Non si può pensare di colmare ingenti tagli al comparto sicurezza, o la soppressione di posti di polizia fondamentali in chiave logistica, con rimedi inutili come questo. Per il teatro ci sono i luoghi deputati - ironizza il presidente dell’Italia dei Diritti - la gente in strada vuole la concretezza e quindi le divise delle forze di polizia, con il senso di sicurezza che queste ultime apportano”.  Antonello De Pierro continua poi la sua riflessione con tali parole: “Non riusciamo ad accettare che contribuiscano in termini di prevenzione e soppressione dei reati alcuni pregiudicati che bellamente occupano alcuni scranni del Parlamento. A questo proposito, credo che le loro condanne definitive non consentano loro di legiferare in tali materia”.   L’Italia dei Diritti, nella persona del suo presidente, chiede infine di rivedere il piano sulla sicurezza, incrementando la presenza di poliziotti sul territorio, dando incentivi agli appartenenti alle forze dell’ordine per interventi fuori dal servizio e recuperando unità operative andando ad attingere negli uffici burocratici dei corpi stessi. Secondo De Pierro, infatti: “Troppo spesso risiedono in essi i figli o gli amici degli amici. E’ quasi matematicamente impossibile che in una città come Roma, nel luogo in cui si consuma un reato, non ci sia un poliziotto, un carabiniere, un finanziere, un agente di polizia penitenziaria o delle guardie forestali, in servizio o in borghese. Infatti, spesso, molti di essi, o per mancanza dell’addestramento necessario, o per scarsa motivazione, evitano di intervenire se non proprio costretti dalle circostanze”.   
Honestly with these past two bailouts, instead of bailing out the guys on wall street, the government could have sent almost everyone to a public university for four years...for free and probably still had lots and lots of money left over. Taxpayers could probably get a free education if our tax dollars were managed a little bit better.
Encyclopedia Dramatica is maintained by trolls. Do not - *do not* - use it to cite anything. Ever.
Like porn.
You are quite welcome, just trying to spread the word of it's yummy goodness. And anything that inspires people to eat double bacon cheeseburgers is a good thing!
Pointless? Okay, so I guess he should just /say/ he stands for a free market, and then constantly vote on bills that give the government more power to regulate and control the market (and the people), instead of actually standing by his principles and providing a bill that will help strike at the root. The Federal Reserve is a huge problem for America. The Federal Reserve prints money and inflates the money supply. It needs to be abolished. [The Case Against the Fed](http://books.google.com/books?id=5rgJI0ya0JcC&amp;printsec=frontcover&amp;dq=the+case+against+the+fed).
CALL IT (202) 551-EXAM
The latest Batman movie (mediocre action movie, very dull), Gladiator (visually poor, dull characters, weak acting, action scenes are cut into tiny pieces), Halloween (maybe because I'm not a teenage girl), and probably a few more I can't think of at the moment.
lmao you dont cut dividends to save "annually".
gotta love how these pundit trolls get to liberals every time, and their faux outrage reactions just keep them employed. 
agreed. it was on sale at Best Buy several weekends in a row, and i was considering buying it. my friend invited me over to watch it and it was HILARIOUS. bought it the next day
Can't be! We're ignorant, but not idiots!
&gt; Is it though? I mean, it could very well be true but I don't see how it is clear that this is a fact. Anarchists have been debating these issues for a very long time - hardly seems clear to me.  That's okay, maybe it's because we have different priors.  I invite you to read Against Intellectual Property, which touches the topic of IP heavily, but also touches the topic of the origination of property itself.  http://mises.org/books/against.pdf  &gt; A market of laws and defense is little different from uniform law. What you propose is just a multitude of states existing to enforce the will of the wealthy instead of a solitary entity.  Nononono.  A "market of laws" I think you misunderstood what means.  I did not mean "law" in the sense that I draft a law that is binding on others, NOT AT ALL.  I meant law in the sense that you and I sign a contract and THAT is the law between you and me, but does not affect anybody else.
three rules for using bluetooth:  1) Use for convenience only  2) Not in public. Ever. This takes precedent over rule 1.  3) (In case there's a loophole.)
Mostly loved by people who don't even seem to get it.
May 9th: Played poker tonight with Scott and Alias from Security, and Steve from Research. Steve was the big winner, but I think he was cheating. Scumbag.  May 10th: One of the higher-ups assigned me to take care of a new creature. It looks like a skinned gorilla. Feeding instructions were to give it live animals. When I threw in a pig, the creature seemed to play with it...tearing off the pig's legs and pulling out the guts before it actually started eating.  May 11th: At around 5 A.M., Scott woke me up. Scared the shit out me, too. He was wearing a protective suit. He handed me another one and told me to put it on. Said there'd been an accident in the basemen t lab. I just knew something like this would happen. Those bastards in Research never sleep, even on holiday.  May 12th: I've been wearing the damn space suit since yesterday. My skin's getting grimy and feels itchy all over. The goddamn dogs have been looking at me funny, so I decided not to feed them today. Screw 'em.  May 13th: Went to the Infirmary because my back is all swollen and feels itchy. They put a big bandage on it and told me I didn't need to wear the suit anymore. All I wanna do is sleep.  May 14th: Found another big blister on my foot this morning. I ended up dragging my foot all the way to the dog's pen. They were quiet all day, which is weird.  May 16th: Rumours going around that a researcher who tried to escape the estate last night were shot. My entire body feels hot and itchy and I'm sweating all the time now. I scratched the swelling on my arm and a piece of rotten flesh just dropped off. What the hell's happening to me?  May 19th: Fever gone but itchy. Today hungry and eat doggie food.  May 21st: Itchy itchy Scott came ugly face so killed him. Tasty.  4 / / Itchy. Tasty.
Well, they are not exactly a developed nation.  And also, they are more-or-less in a state of constant siege by the Mexican federal government.  However they're not paying federal taxes in the regions that they control, which I suppose could be considered a pretty big gain considering that the federal government had not been exactly taking care of the region.  edit: [more info](http://flag.blackened.net/revolt/mexico/ezln/2004/marcos/advancesAUG.html)  &gt;In Los Altos of Chiapas, for example, the health system is providing free medical care and, as far as their resources can reach, medicines are also free. This is possible because of two things: One is because of the economic support from civil society that has allowed medical teams and medicines to be secured. The other is because, instead of just concentrating on treating illnesses, the health system is especially aimed at preventative medicine.  &gt;In the five regions where the Good Government Juntas are operating, health campaigns are being carried out which promote the use of latrines and the cleanliness of dwellings. Campaigns are also being undertaken, although they are just now becoming widespread, to fight chronic illnesses (such as leshmaniasis or "chiclero ulcer") and epidemics and in order to detect cancer in women.   &gt;From the urgent to the immediate. The problem of the displaced (primarily the ones of Polho') is the one which most concerns the good government in Los Altos of Chiapas. Of the almost 3 and a half million pesos which Oventik spent, approximately 2.5 million were earmarked for Polho'. But not just for food. A municipal grocery store and a cooperative for displaced women were built and put into operation.  &gt;In order to improve everyone's nutrition, throughout the five regions there have been put into operation cooperatives for pig production ("No, they don't produce politicians," they clarified before I could pose the standard question), for hens, sheep ("No, they aren't PAN deputies voting for Lo'pez Obrador's ouster," they told me, and I'm damned if I'm going to ask anything else), chickens and cattle (cows, mules and the odd ox - without offending anyone), for vegetables and for fruit trees.  &gt;With words from the selva: "Up to this point we have improved the food a bit thanks to the lands which were recovered from the great fincas [large agribusiness farms, mostly for export], because we're harvesting more maize and beans there, and the agro-ecological projects. Thanks to our organization, we've been able to greatly reduce alcoholism, which has allowed us to use the little money we have for food. We've also been able to improve our houses, though not much, but now we have better roofs, cleaner houses, with larger spaces for planting fruit trees, vegetables, flowers and to have animals outside the house."
Boy and girl tragically lack oxygen.
Of course, if you were ANY less vague, you'd be making apparent how bad Israel's actions have been.  But why would you. You're Dr. Vague.
WTF! this guy is legit! He is my best friend! known him since middle school back in Cali. I introduced him to reddit! -Peace up, A-town down
should i tell my family i'm straight?
I'm not ashamed to admit I kind of love the salmon bots.  The first thing I always say is "Hi!  We've been salmoned. No, you haven't been hacked, and I don't actually see your REAL aim screen name.  Then I link them to the lj community themissinghat which is all about the salmontacobots.
A few of my friends argued with me whether they were sitting on their front porch, or their front patio. I kept telling them that a porch is covered, and a patio is uncovered.  I thought I'd make a public service announcement differentiating the two.
Is there a reason for your multiple posts?
I used a line similar to this at a restaurant.  A friend of mine got a bucket of Bud Light and I grabbed one.  The waitress came and asked for my ID and I told her, "I'm pretty sure this water has more alcohol in it than this beer."
I started using single ply recycled paper about the same time I quit driving a car, 1992. The article is spot on.
Gary Busey
' +  ' = "  Problem solved.  Where's my fucking cookie.
Mermaids do exist!
I think it's Polish. The word "Nekrmit" is on there.
Glad I stopped taking that.
300  I could never get into it, I tried watching it several times.
He is "challenged"  I bet even pepper spray, no scratch that, hot sauce would have worked just fine.
i use a Q6600 2.4ghz with 3gb RAM with ableton live and stack loads of VSTs. Handles it pretty well and not too expensive. 
Wait. They have online cop schools? o.O
I thought the WTF part was the tie fighter picture...
It's so much more entertaining not to say *anything* at *all*. If you live together she comes home to an empty house, if you have your own place, you change your number, and locks if your were *dumb* enough to give her a key.  Then she has a really LONG time to think about what she did and she can't blame anything on you since you aren't there to bitch.  If you ever do bump into the bitch, there's a fine chance a few drinks and a joint later you can jam another on in there, and disappear all over again!!  repeat if necessary.
Utazás kubába, nyaralás kuba, repülőjegy, kubai hotel, hotelek, last minute autóbérlés kubában. Kuba körutazás, fly and drive esküvő, nászút. Programok, búvárkodás, kubai utak, befektetés üzleti lehetőség kuba képek, fotók, hírek.
yea.. what  makes it creepy to eat.
We live in a multicultural world. Not respecting other people's culture is racist.
So you don't think the Federal Reserve should be audited? Even Kucinich thinks it should be audited.
I want my baby back ribs.
It would only be ironic if he were a wizard.
I don't live in WA. What's the deal with the town of Burien?
I was in them both and I quite disagree. 
Well, Jahweh was, originally, a god of war.
I also hate alert(). However fake modal dialogs, or even fake dialogs (i.e. dialogs that exist only in the browser) although not specifically lazy in my mind are near as terrible
Last year they proposed to shut down 10-12 churches in Copenhagen, but I'm actually not sure if they've done it yet. I remember Design/Architect-competitions to try and figure out what to do with the empty buildings. 
Will breed machines, they evolve faster.
I see. So given that criminal groups, companies and people in general normally tend to self-organize and get protective of their carved out pieces of the pie really quickly, this not really happening in case of the botnet market is probably attributable to, and indicative of the dynamic nature of the 'Net. Actually, that dynamic nature may increase during the coming months and years, as the IPv4 space is depleted, and less and less machines stay online with the same IP address. OTOH, it's not as if botnet zombies really required their IPs to remain the same...
Is Obama responsible for global warming too?
Why'd you let your wife cook, then?  They always over cook the goddamn ribs.
Disliking a possible answer has no bearing on it being true or not.  A beautiful theory can still be wrong.  An ugly fact can still be true.  
Hot damn - that's a thick layer of verbosity!
You've seriously got preparation before the confirmation in school? Sounds really weird to a Swede...
woah dude, does this seriously help them sell shoes?  its like a weird ass manifesto. 
.  &gt;_&lt;
Weak data, shitty assumptions.   Maybe we need a "badscience" subreddit? 
Yes its strange, but we did have christianity before columbus found dry land.  Second reason is Denmark didn't get bombed like the southern part of England and Germany.  Yes the churches are more or less everywhere and they are often rather old and beautiful, but religion as such just doesn't penetrate. Believe it or not, I've never seen a add anywhere promoting religion either.  I know its strange, I don't really get it either.  But the article is very spot on
There are a lot more red cars than I would have imagined.
So you're okay with people looting and pillaging your land, then.
Ooooh... Europe. That's that country above Africa, right?  &gt; that it drops photos sometimes.  Yeah, I've heard that too. Still, it is often said that an artist's most valuable tool is the eraser.
On the fast end of things sure, but when json/thrift takes 0.4 second and protobuf takes 3 seconds...  A better example:  I used to use xmlrpc lib a lot in python.  I have a function that returns a list of 20,000 tuples.  It takes maybe 4 seconds to call, no big deal.  I gave someone access to this function that was using PHP, and they were complaining that it was taking too long to run.  Turns out the php xmlrpc library in use was taking minutes to parse the xml!
Boring troll is boring.
Keep trying. You'll figure it out. Words are hard.
Aww. now I cry. :`(  I guess I should have read [this](http://basicinstructions.net/?p=390) before I typed my response. 
Nonono.  NONONO.  A corporation is a LEGAL FICTION, resting in a filer somewhere in the planet.  The people who compose it, the capital and the buildings, those are distinct entities.  I know it is a shortcut to say that corporations influence public policy, but it is very important to remember that it's not the corporations themselves (being inanimate fictions in the realm of your and my heads), but EXECUTIVES in those corporations and lobbyists hired by them, [which have a very high likelihood of being psychopaths](http://www.hare.org/links/saturday.html) who will argue ANYTHING to get their way.  Once you divorce the fantasy from the real, it's pretty clear whom you must target as a matter of policy, or how you must reengineer the system.  One good thing would be to abolish corporations altogether -- that way, every psychopath is liable for his disasters and less likely to commit them, instead of being able to take shelter in corporate trials and shit.
Sup dawwwg? I herd uz like tu complain...
Someone did that in our neighborhood last year, but they spelled it beliving.  So now whenever we hear that song, we sing it that way.  "Hold on to that filling..."
Basically. Or money that is going to something that won't automatically reelect you.
I had no idea who he was until I herd about yo dawg.  Now he's a household name.  Jackass.
I have a newfound respect for robots that can more or less flawlessy assemble something. Like a car for example.
I meant, does this mean that over the course of its execution, the program allocated 12 GB of memory?  I figured that at any one point in time it must not be more than a few MB.
Yeah! I bought them on CC for 50% off. Love it so far.
Sup dog, I heard you think this meme is old so I posted this comment agreeing with you.
When I watched that video my ad said:  &gt;Looking for atheist women?  I was going to submit a screenshot but typing it here is fine.
What leads you to believe that reddit has blocked you?
Aliens.
Lucky guess?
and I thank you for that
Because we want to not limit freedom of speech and religion? Forget Israel for a minute, they will always be at war with their neighbors, this document says we can't speak out as we like because it offends theocracies. You know what? Fuck 'em, I say we quit the UN before we give in to demands that spit on our Constitution and individual rights in general. 
I agree! I figured I'd never get into credit card debt without a credit card.
Willingness to do the kind of crap this bank did is what got us where we are.
For a country that wraps scraps and blood in pig and sheep guts, it seems weird to me that so many are turned off by the parts that are the farthest from the ass. If you look at the heads you will see that they are more neck than head so why the fuss?
So what are we cooking?
In the night club district in my city a girl was shot in the head by her BF and left in a coma.  From her name I looked up her Myspace and the ad was   "How long will you live?"
Actually it kind of would. 
Classy. Do you feel like a bigger man?
I'm so sick of titles like that.
DO NOT WASTE MY TIME INVOKING ME WITH COMPLAINTS ABOUT THE LOCATION OF VOLCANOES, MORTAL.  WASTE THAT OF HEPHAESTUS.  AND FOR YOUR INFORMATION, THOSE LATINS HAD IT COMING.
Yeah unlike a journalist on MSNBC who gets a tingle up his leg when he sees Obama or says, “Oh God,” when about to hear the Conservative response to an Obama speech. If there is one thing I hate more than a liar it’s a God damn hypocrite and if you don’t think that MSNBC is much more biased than Fox news than you are either fucking retarded or a biased hypocrite so which is it fucktard? Concept of spin are you fucking kidding me? EDIT : as I expected no fucking liberal will defend MSNBC as being nothing more than the Obama network, but they will down vote you for pointing it out. It might as well change its name to the, "Obama propaganda network," or OPN for short. 
Nah... Palin was in the media non-stop every day since she was chosen. People still think she's "conservative". Give Ron Paul the same amount of air time and he's in the #1 spot right now. When Ron Paul runs in 2012 he'll be able to mock all of the other "conservatives" (in a nice way) and essentially show the people how their claims of supporting a "free" market and a small government are fraudulent.
ZOMFG Constantine YESSSSS. I watched it abouit 10 times in the theatre (i worked at one and got in for free). And I bought the 2-disc special edition the day it released on DVD. Its one of the greatest Keanu roles, as well as Rachel Weisz. Its genuinely creepy at times, dives way into lore and philosophy, etc. I -loved- it. And the fact that it didnt have the typical fairytale ending was epic. I hope he does a sequel to this but everyone seems to hate it so much i know it wont happen. 
sorry if it's a dupe.. saw it in the comments..
Don't be a douche.  Tag it with NSFW next time.
I think the same thing about confirm dialogs on file deletion. Replace the confirm dialog with a delete dialog that is spawned as the result of an arm-delete action. I prefer the arm-it -&gt; do-it workflow over the do-it -&gt; confirm-it workflow. They are the same but the verbage is different. The recent trend in naming buttons for their action e.g. 'delete' over 'ok', is a good thing.
St James is one of the better places, except the pub is muck. Try Mulligans on Poolberg street, O'Donohuges on Baggot Street (best somking garden in Dublin, if not the world), Neary's on Chatham street (downstairs is nice, but upstairs is better), or Peter's Pub on William's Street.
This is because you're dirty... Clean the kitchen, and close the windows, don't be a pig.
what if you say god damn?
a few more times, i'm sure. get over it.
You!  get back to picking that lettuce for $50/hr!
Social contract theory is pretty funny, you have to admit.  edit: As much as if not more [hilarious](http://www.reddit.com/r/socialism/comments/80rrt/something_every_socialist_should_be_aware_of_the/c07ygqf).  &gt;As an anarchist / capitalist / voluntarist with 145 IQ, 3 languages, an engineering degree, vast work experience and thousands of books under my belt...  Fallacy of appealing to authority much?  Anyway, I've read *hundreds of thousands* of books, so there!  Also, I seriously do not understand why people use Somalia as an example of how great anarchism could be. I mean, the country is basically run by regional warlords that rule with an iron fist.  And that's not even mentioning the Islamic courts that have their own militias attempting to establish Sharia law.
which, for people not living in rural areas, is nearly impossible. I make a good living, and that rule would put me at 1,400/month, about 200k. Assuming 2 people can't survive in 600 sq ft for long, I'm looking for 1,000-1,500 sq ft. Let me tell you what that buys in a decent neighborhood in Seattle: Nothing. Nada.   I suppose this is why I just don't believe that house prices will stop falling anytime this year. But I need to move out of the current situation. Damn conundrum. 
I don't really have any scars, but sometimes I'll find random cuts or bruises on my body and have no idea how I got them. I must be a violent sleeper or something.
I'm moving soon and will have the perfect space to set up a home brewing area.  What websites and equipment would you guys recommend for someone new to this?
I've had it in SC, FL, GA, TN, &amp; VA.
Wow, that's odd on my part. I'm not in HS and my bank only allows me $200 per day. My credit is fine, and I asked if I could raise it, but they wouldn't let me.
"They're coming right for us,shoot"
Wait, that thing I just ate was a *baby*?! Well, it needed more salt.
Didn't this come out 5 years ago?
u just been trolled
&gt;"Now you see, America, who runs your country" &gt;Since there is no race identified, you are making an assumption  Even without knowing texmex comment history on the subject, this statement appears in a Reddit article that claims the US will not attend human rights conference because of Israel. Who do *you* suppose texmex is referring to? I'd love to hear your thoughts.  BTW, the article itself is a classic ignorant Reddit Israel-hatred: there are 4 articles the US disagrees with, including mention of slavery and ban on criticizing religion in the media, yet only the one having to do with singling out Israel is brought here.   &gt;Also, try not to think of genocide as definable in relativistic terms  Thanks for this kind advice. I will go one further, and try not to think of civilian casualties in war as genocide. I know this might shock you, but there isn't now and there never was a "genocide" of Palestinians by Israelis. It just never happened. The sheer statistics show that Palestinians' numbers have actually grown more than almost any other group in the past 60 years, and particularly so since 1967.  (I fully expect your next comment to be "try not to think of genocide in terms of people getting killed". Of course not. Genocide is what the retards in Reddit say it is, not what some pesky "facts" show.)
Is this... THE Adam?
Really this is an Insult to Fred Rodgers, who would have stood against anything this man stands for.
But does it have a plan?
Awesome.  I shall upvote you now.
That is my phone screensaver. I added "spanker" on the banner though.
Weirdest one I remember was a Parkinson interview i think in the early 80's possibly with Richard Burton (some kind redditor from the UK can correct me if im wrong). Basically Burton (I think) stumbled on set with a large glass (and posssibly bottle) and settled down for the interview. I remember during the interview he decided to walk about the set, talk to the audience, drink, lie on the floor and attempt to speak which was a massive effort as he was so drunk. Suprisingly i cant find any mention of this on the net or youtube  
Sister Mary-Elephant.
Don't pay any attention to Jindal -- he's not a worthy candidate. The only worthy candidate for 2012 is Ron Paul. I'm just waiting for him to announce that he's running.
I find it hard to believe these carvings are 10.000 years old, they don't look a day over 3000.
..."no't"? Really?
Yeah, but then you'll have the angels quarreling over who gets to wield the fiery sword...   It wouldn't be pretty, I can tell you that much. You ever smelt burnt feathers?
Okay! Everyone proliferating the "Sup Dawg" meme must cease immediately!  However, the "Yo Dawg" meme may continue in full force.  That is all.
yeah, it's called pornhub.com/categories. As well as being incredibly difficult for the GOP to find, it apparently makes your dick harder. 
"Life During Wartime" is my favorite track from that show. The DVD of the show is pretty hard to track down, at least where I live. The one time I found it in a store, they were asking $24 for a used copy!
Because it's not the Democrat party, you dumb fuck. It's the Democratic party. How would you feel if we kept (deliberately) calling your party the Republic party?
Chef Ramsey would know. I mean, he *looks* like he's killed and garnished a baby.
I've never understood why people drink that stuff...  At that point it's just like drinking dirty water with weird sugar substitutes.
How about the fact that the main villain in the movie turns into a giant electrical super storm or something like that? The climax battle of the entire film is a basically Hulk vs. a Tornado.   It was such a cop out to an otherwise decent film. 
I'm from Saskatoon and it's not even remotely close to being like this outside.
Why did that woman have a basketball on her groceries?
And so we laugh! I'm sure he's fully aware of it, too.
Mine lasted 18 months before deciding not to work (it had heavy usage too). I was so impressed I bought another of the same. Plugs into the usb, has a long cord, volume control and retractable mic for when you just want to use as headphones. A+++++ would buy again.
Lard filled...bleh!
*pulls out a piece of paper and writes: Xzibit, Gary Busey*...
Maybe it's like the talking stick groups of children are encouraged to use.
Lesson of the day; never get stuck in police custody, better to die taking a few pigs with you.
Do apples grow in the desert?
This movie used to come on every Thanksgiving time and my brother and i watched it every year. When we moved out on our own we forgot about it. One thanksgiving my brother gets a package the night before and he hands it to me gleefully. Its a DVD copy of Legend. I nearly came. It was epic, and well done, and I dont care who says otherwise
Well, if the issue is reducing violence between repo men and citizens, it seems to me that bringing along a cop is going to make someone think twice before pulling a gun out.  If there wasn't a problem with the way they were doing it already we wouldn't be having this conversation.
Sure, an internet meme made him a household name
they will be like the republicans and just accept it as their platform. who cares about about principles when you can just root for your team.  politics now is just a sport for boring people, with the elections being the Super Bowl. 
Yeah right.  Sure thingee. Buffet is everyone's hero... nevermind that he's frigging played the float on their insurance money for years, and now (despite assurances to the contrary) he's revealed as a player in the derivatives "swap" market.  The tiny brain cannot countenance that their "hero" made a TON of money investing in the tobacco companies they all collectively -- supposedly -- abhor... nope brain might explode if it ever accepted the reality of any of that!  Heaven forbid that your "hero" should have feet covered in mud, nope, the brain cannot countenance that. (Just like Alan Greenspan was everyone's "Maestro" until...)
You mean neo-conservatives 'choose' Romney? Ron Paul wins, 2012.
Thanks.  I thought it was a term after "baby daddy" that referred to a human being.  Like the baby you have so you can get you some food stamps.
Me too, I see people link things in forums and everyone say how awesome it is.  I feel like I should have given everyone another year of having this awesome thing but can never bring myself to think people will actually care.
This may be a tabloid article, but there is an apparent dip in average human height around the dawn of agriculture. It is true that our bodies are evolved for a high protein diet with only minimal carbohydrates from fruits, nuts, berries, and wild vegetation. Trust me, I lost 50 pounds on a diet like that in about 2 months.
It might have something to do with the DIABEETUS.
What could possibly make you think that I'm following you around? 
SO I figured I would be clever and fast forward to the nudie stuff.  I saw some yoko ono looking cunt lying naked on top of a bunch of old skeletons in a crypt.  this bitch can get fucked.. I think she's looking for the wrong kind of boner.  http://www.mirukim.com/nakedcityspleen/images/cata1.jpg
Well, presumably you would put something like "username AT example DOT com" as the alt text on the image. As for the second thing, that was just an example; I've seen some complicated ways of representing an e-mail address to try and avoid scraping, even something as long-winded as "e-mail me at example.com, my username is foobar"
I loved Sphere, and Resurrection, but i couldnt much stand Alien 3
I believe that was the joke. And it's *sup dawg*, now. Get with the times.
Nope. Sorry. He's gambling with OPM -- same as always.
Topical, I hope. Cuz I hate those suppositories. 
france?
I was thinking the same thing.
If I didn't think Audrey Tautou was so *effing* cute, this would be my favorite Jean-Pierre Jeunet.
you need to read the article next time. Also those upvoting you.  He was talking about post-high school training, not college.  The headline is just terrible.
looks really good, but for me this would be too distracting
Agreed, Obama is not afraid to have a war (@see Afghanistan), he didn't want wars where we weren't there for any reason other than pleasing Neocon extremists within our government (@see Cheney and Bush). He always said he supported Israel just like this guy said. I'm glad to see the voice of reason and moderation, rather than "Oh noes! teh Israelis are @ it agin" 
Careful what you wish for.
A very nice white can be printed on black paper using screenprinting.
&gt;there are flags floating on every house *looks out window* Nooooooo?
...is not Israeli. They just copied it.  Just like they copied hummus and kebabs. Just buy from Arab-Americans. : )
She was removing her shoes, indicated by the way she casually started removing the second shoe just before Robocop came at her like a freight train. I hope someone beats the fuck out of that cop.
He actually does neither. What he does is "leverage" other people's money and then scraoe the cream off of the top.
My guess was vomiting Jagermeister....  I'd actually prefer drinking urine over Red Bull or Jagermeister.
In denmark, you're not patriotic just because you wave a flag. People will most likely laugh if you said otherwise.  @wazoox: I'd have to disagree that there's a flag floating on every house. Everyone has a flag-"pole", which most people use merely to mourn someone or something (the flag is only raised halfway up the pole). It is very rare that you see someone putting the flag up daily. I can't even remember when I've last seen the danish flag around where I live.  A Dane
No response, just another down vote? I guess I won't post any more WEC articles...
Jewish whales?
"Do these mysterious stones mark the site of the Garden of Eden?"  No.
I'm sure there are a bunch of dinosaurs that could be considered potential "Crocobirds" as well.
Actually, this is a movie i loved since it came out. I thought it was really well done, especially for a mash-up type movie. Plus, I loved the acting, it was pretty well done graphically too.
That is one beautiful nice ass.  All you breast men out here just have no way to appreciate that.
Well, I don't know who you are; I made an assumption and I was wrong. When I see questions about web programming in C I usually think of my friends who had a semester or two of C.S. along with their anthro degree or whatever and don't see why you'd want all these silly new languages.  &gt; There's some C# at work, too. Etc., etc., etc.,   incl. a template engine in Common Lisp.  My hat's off to you for your flexibility. I think "one language to rule them all" is a far more common sensibility, though.  &gt; Before that it was mainly Perl. Today I like Python.  Python is a cancer. It's a decent language; but anyone who respects the "language renaissance" and wants to see it continue ought to boycott it on principle. We're seeing "just use Python" morph into an injunction to sit on your duff.
My dad was in a freshman class that Bloom taught. He says it was one of the best classes he's ever taken. Thanks for this!
We called them that in the old days, when we tied onions to our belts, cause that was also the fashion of the times.
Slim to None! you're dreaming! the Dems will kill any attempt to do this.
&gt;her 40 favorite DT songs  waaaait a second  &gt;her  Women who like prog actually *exist?!*  Introduce me to her :3
Like most "science" reporting, the article ignored the actual scientific arguments involved, and focused on the gossip - personalities and personal conflicts.
My fondest memories are of the Saturn version - is that a port of the 3DO version? Good times...
Yum... Babies taste good!
since when does anyone consent to rearing a child by having sex?
alert() is eager, not lazy.
Unibroue fan, are you?
me myself and irene
I'd put some sort of cleaning cloth at some point on the inside of the sliding roof :) Not perfect but it'd take care of the worst bits.
Borders employees do not make commission. 
Upvoted for Serendipity, and Jeepers Creepers 2
You are right about this one.
Thanks to Toronto's [Yummy Stuff](http://yummystuff.ca/) for making the delicious sweet and salty confection. It was fantastic. 
Yes, the laptop clients are running windows. The servers that the clients are connected to are running linux. The reason why the laptops are running windows is probably because most laptops are made with windows on it, and they don't see the point of spending resources on installing linux on all the laptops when they are just going to be used for client side data entry anyways.
yup. hells angels vs. arab gangs. It's getting quite bad here in Copenhagen.
But the GSR was on Katrina's sleeves. The verdict is in, (puts on sunglasses) but the jury's out.
I've always figured the internet would eventually lead to the end of religion. It is difficult to maintain irrational ideas with so much information available to everyone.
I've never seen so many contiguous o's in a URL in ages!
Are anarcho-primitivists really that much of a nuisance in your life?
He already did, just in case the Iraqi government breaks down. They will be on stand down and only be there to keep down the coupes and be on the periphery only. This is the best balance for now. 
That's the thing. You call it an Apartheid state, when you know full well the implications of that terminology. Meanwhile Israel has several Arab parties, etc., and it's clearly not on the level of, say, Sudan. But you inject so much emotion into your discussion of Israel that it makes me wonder about racism.  As for "Jew-bashing," I saw it and I just denounced it. Then you commented. What the fuck?  Again (sigh) I'm railing not against you, but against people that say "Well, fuck the american jewish leaders, then and anyone following them," written below, and get upvoted to 45 while I get downvoted for only saying stop being racist. The people denouncing below him got downvoted as well. So that just clinches the racism idea in my view.
Hospital or Other Medical Establishment
My family has a similar cure-all: Tennessee Whiskey.
Hollywood keeps making terrible movies based on mediocre comic books. And people are still stupid enough to gobble up that shit. The acting was terrible and the action was just bull shit.
I agree with the article. Myself, a Swede, I see no real need for soul-searching, the meaning of life and religion. I'll die one day, and then I'll find out what happens. Until then, I'll try to live a good life and make sure those close to me do too. Not that hard, is it?
You mess with the bull, you get the horns.
s/ego/create awareness
PROTIP
NO, WHY would you THINK that?  The way to solve the issue you are thinking about is through dispute resolution organizations and defense organizations.  If you and I have a contract with DROs, this signals cooperation and tracks our reputations, and they can mediate our disputes.  If you don't, since there is no law, I can prevent you from looting and pillaging my land by any means necessary.  Or recover my property by all means necessary too, since there is no moral problem with using violence against people who have obtained property by illegitimate means.  You do not need a central law center and a central police to enforce property rights.  All you need is enough decentralized contracts and firepower to prevent the scenario you talk about.  So, what is it you want to talk about, morals or legalities?
You missed the point. It was an [insert name of hero/villian here] comment.
Did I do something wrong?  http://imgur.com/37EGZ
Of course they don't! What in Hades did you think the digital stenography array was for?
Ellen or Starbuck is the dying leader
Unless you're physically attacking a cop, there is no excuse for that. If you can't keep your cool you shouldn't be a cop, plain and simple.
Not to mention the aggressor was likely armed.
No, the internet did. The ORIGINAL image was 'sup dawg' and had been around about 6 months before the rest of the internet suddenly started ruining it. -_-
You've never seen any common folk riding in inexplicably pimped out cars?  That's all Xzibit's doing.
How long does that all take?
&gt;So given that criminal groups, companies and people in general normally tend to self-organize and get protective of their carved out pieces of the pie really quickly, this not really happening in case of the botnet market  It's not really happening in the case of the botnet market? I think it is. People who run botnets are very protective of their claim but others want it for themselves as well just like turf wars in gangs. The gangs don't work together to divide up the areas. They are constantly fighting trying to take the turf of someone else and claim it as their own. This isn't done by IP addresses though. The turf isn't an IP range but just all the boxes that the person has under their control. They do everything they can to keep other trojans off their zombies while trying to take over other people's zombies. The structure is the same as any gang, business, or even government as they make claim to their own territory and defend that while trying to gain more power and territory. 
HAHAHAHA!!!  A very good likeness for Jamie!  LMAO!
Definitely agree. Different body composition can come from lots of factors... and people in excellent shape can still have a little "extra padding". It's usually healthier for you too (well, at least in terms of life expectancy, I don't know what that says about quality of life).  Seems like now that we don't need our bodies to survive, people are just judged (visually) on arbitrary rules.
short answer no. Long answer NOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO
She jumped nearby it.
ok, liked it :)
Yeah, my grandma has one of those
I suspect you'd kill for many things.
How much macaroni and lentils was confiscated at the Gaza border today? Do you know?
[Regretfully, persons of the female gender are presently unaware of the nature, shape or form of my genitalia.](http://encyclopediadramatica.com/Verbose)
Do you see what happens, Larry? This is what happens, Larry, when you FUCK A STRANGER IN THE ASS!!
YO DAWG I HERD YOU LIKE PIKES SO I PUT A PIKE IN YOUR PIKE SO YOU CAN DIE WHILE YOU DIE.
Let us know if its worth a watch. I really digged the first one, but can't imagine the new one measuring up.
My brother recently started to 'get' the internets and likes to be excited every time he hears new things.  It's kind of funny to see him excited about things that are commomplace online.
It's trite and banal unless you're an average NYT-reading urbanite, I imagine. Many of them may read it, tsk-tsk, and shake their heads. But some of them might be very slightly enlightened. I think that's a good thing.
Welcome to Gleaning the Harvest! We know you are going to be encouraged by what you find here. If you are not familiar with Our Mission, we hope you will take time to read about it. God has called His People to care for the widows and fatherless with the their gleanings, and we are encouraged that He has already made this provision for these dear families.
Opposip.  The act of squirting liquid outward through a straw.
They'll only cause problems in Mexico by becoming well educated, integrate into diverse communities, stop making babies and learn English! harharhar ima dick
It is imperative that high school students be made aware that options for post-graduation exist beyond seeking a 4-year degree at a traditional university. I was a good student in HS, and graduated with a 3.6 GPA. It only took one quarter at a state school to realize that it simply wasn't for me; I'm going to be starting trade school next fall. Everyone deserves to know what their options are before making a decision, and not be afraid to do something non-traditional. A college education is valuable, but it is truly not for everyone. And that's not a bad thing. 
I believe if you did invoke such a meme in the situation in question, you should probably go up to the highest capacity of your living arrangement, and just jump off of it. Be sure to fall on a sharp object of some sort.
&gt; 30th of June 2054 -: newly united world order agrees to medicate drinking water...  &gt; 20th of June 2054 :- 90% of the population is dead.  So, did 90% of the population dying cause a new world order deciding to medicate drinking water?
I agree.  I went to church.  I was not abused.
I knew! My brother and I purchased the actual DBZ movies straight from Japan on VHS in the mid-late 90's because we loved the TV show so much. It was english subtitled, and the translations on the titles were horrendous, such as the one with Broli was "The Galaxy is in Danger, The Super Awesome Guy". I never forgot that title lol, and its been a decade or more since i last watched it.
Interesting idea, but I'd be interested to know why I should care.  It looks like xubuntu re-themed to look like BeOS with one or two new pieces of software (they might even be existing pieces of software, I just didn't recognize them...)  So what's so special about this project?
Here is the dark side about investing in gold. Money that is sitting in gold is doing NOTHING to build a company, nothing to give people jobs, and nothing to help the economy.  As the stock market goes down, and gold and commodities go up, do not expect an end to our economic problems any time soon. Investing in gold is no different than burying your money in your back yard as far as the economy is concerned.  Who is to say how many billions of dollars are NOT being used to build companies, give people jobs, and better the lives of everyone because that money is not being put to work.
if(!window.console) window.console = {log:function(){}}; console.log("debug statement");  firebug users rejoice.
What about a covered patio? And what about a deck? Is a deck just an uncovered porch?
No, never. If you cant stand it, you cant stand it. Unless you never really listened to it in the first place. I could listen to fucking garbage like Jimmy Buffet, or the Eagles or the grateful dead over and over and over again, and it will still be just shit. but by them i have probably jumped out of a window.
I do that too, it's why I can stand rap now. People play it all around me. I think it's a survival instinct. Not so great when it comes to alarm clocks though.
So where does it say he wants evolution taken out of the classroom?
See if [this](http://thinkmath.edc.org/index.php/Length,_width,_height,_depth) helps.  Generally - in many (American) commercial/ad contexts - the longest number will be the length, the other number will be the width, and the last number will be the height.
Cops ARE psychologically screened, but I'm sure some still make it through...
Hi, I'm Chris Hansen from Dateline NBC. Why don't you have a seat right there.
Great message!
I've had four Coho IM's in three days now. It's interesting to talk to people you don't know at random intervals. At first I thought I was being spammed or something. Then I Googled. And all was well. ;)
Help! I got this old Pentium-D 3.4 off eBay.  The price was right, and it suits my needs well. However, I have NEVER had a computer with a CPU fan this noisy.  The case is stays cool, but the CPU apparently stays hot ALL the time, regardless.  It's not a fan-setting issue.  There's just too much heat. I guess I could replace the big heatsink and fan with an even bigger one to try to lower the noise, but I'm afraid it might not help enough.   Theoretically, I could go to peltiers or water cooling, but if I had that kind of budget I wouldn't be buying stuff off eBay.  Might as well buy a new computer at that rate. But I am at my wit's end.  I can't work next to this dust-buster sound anymore. Any suggestions?
Sigh, that is such a common excuse. The Belgians are not a homogenous society, and they do pretty well. Sweden has 9,2 million inhabitants, of which about 1-1,5 million are first or second generation immigrants (Syrians, Greeks, Chileans, Finns, Turkish and Iranian Kurds, Christian Iraqis, Iraqi Kurds, Italians and quite some people from Thailand mainly).
If you were a detainee in Abu Ghraib, you'd absolutely love Metallica!
*suckee
Sure.
Impossible!  An outrage!
Yeah, I used to experience this too. But I've had enough karma for a while now, unless they have changed it recently.
If you can't handle the job, you leave the police force before you begin to crack.
I think everyone gets that once in a while.  I just told God- if you don't want me on this path, make it painfully evident. And, so far, it's where He wants me.
The first time I realized this happening to me more often I started to be less of a music troll and try not to say something was horrible unless I had listened to it a few times.  Ive also changed from saying "This band sucks" to "This band has talent but I dislike there music" with exception being nickleback
One of the dumbest and paranoid posts on reddit I've read yet.
I assure you I was just kidding. I remember when he was elected I told my left leaning-leaning friends, "This guys won't be much different from Clinton".
Placing higher esteem on human resources positions would benefit the entirety of our society. 
Truly you speak.  But the year is yet young.
The point is that this site might have served as the inspiration for the mythical story of the garden of Eden.  The article isn't saying that the garden of Eden ever existed in the biblical sense, rather, "many scholars view the Eden story as folk-memory, or allegory."
Yeah, these people didnt watch his recent speach.
I don't smoke weed anymore.  I don't smoke weed any less either.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=IueXtzdC6kA&amp;fmt=18
No.
I agree!! - I used to categorically hate rap/pop, but now that I'm taking a second look, it's surprising how musically intriguing some of them are. 
I don't vote because I'm underage.
When I clicked the link "womanizer" started playing on my roommate's computer. Worst Combo Ever. def nightmare producing.
I've had my share of stouts (try La Barberie's Stout Impérial if you're ever in Quebec City), and Guiness holds up very well against any of them. It's certainly not as tasteful as many other stouts, but makes up for it in it's subtlety and smoothness. The problem is that it's un-exportable, and absolutely horrible outside of Dublin. Even in Dublin, it's very easy to find pubs with horrible Guinness (I'm looking at you, Bleeding Horse!). The point is that a good pint of Guinness is hard to find, but once you've found it... As always, YMMV.
That sounds pretty similar to the current system of law that is in place to me, for all practical purposes.  What you're advocating is just a system in which the poor have little or no protection.  I can just imagine the death squads sweeping through the ghettos.  Well, I guess its a good solution to global overpopulation in its own fucked up, twisted way.  Just set the price for protection at a high enough mark that only 1 or 2 percent of the population can afford it and then send out the death squads.  I see little difference between a decentralized system of of law determined by the wealthy and a centralized system of law determined by the wealthy, honestly.  It would just be a lot bloodier, I imagine.
You made a noble sacrifice.
Can I have just one?
You lost 50 pounds on a high protein diet? (That sentence is a little ambiguous for me.)
I sell the keys to your ball &amp; chain.
recognize my potential! lol jk
The documentary explores the various myths and gods which contributed to the characterization of the Biblical Devil. So, rattling off the Biblical Devil's appearances is pointless.   
No, a woman does not consent to receive HIV.  Similarly, sex is not consent to be a mother/father.
The people like you - that can cry and cuddle your dog, aren't the people who dump their dogs at the pounds...  *hugs  :)
I was just saying this the other day.  children trust their parents. they're impressionable and mostly helpless. scaring them with stories of going to hell for immorality and teaching them to believe in an invisible deity that probably doesn't exist is going to affect them for the rest of their lives, just like molesting a child would.
wow i have never heard this, who are these people...  &lt;/sarcasm&gt;
&gt;No one with financial education actually thinks derivatives are inherantly bad.  Of course, everyone with the bog-standard "financial edumacation" is having their ass BAILED OUT right now by the taxpayers.  So much for that.
Atheists don't converse with satan because they don't believe he is any more real than your god.
French Canada is pissed at anyone that looks their way.
Who said anything about MSNBC? Olbermann has many of the same faults in reporting as O'reilly. OP to your reply mentioned Fox because they spin the facts as did the cop in his own report. MSNBC doesn't spin as much, but the biases are obvious.    Just a heads up
You should try reading the article.
I remember reading it somewhere two-three years ago online. It was a really long article about this reality show in Korea or China about a man who was kidnapped, locked in a room and was given little things here and there to entertain himself. He was kept there for a few years I think, and it was JUST like Oldboy, which is why I read the article. I desperately want to read it again, but, I cannot find it ANYWHERE and can't remember where I first found it...  Thank you if you find this for me!
Yeah well no one in my family has been brutally murdered but I'm sure it's happening somewhere.  Get out of your fantasy world and realize the law enforcement system is rotten.  Deep rot.
Ah, did not see that. But I think even then, being an in-order processor really hurts Atom in terms of performance per clock.
Holy shit...a draganov and ak47...i played with buttons at that age!
i can only assume you're making a joke.
i &lt;# u. It just always takes too long to make sun tea, but I remember being a kid at family cookouts and my dad grilling burgers &amp; my mom making sun tea.  Pretty much the only happy memories I had growing up.
My friends *dad* tried to get him to read those books. 
"When i grow up i want to be,sexual harassment panda"
Can I get a nug of that wall?
&gt; What happens when I come and try to steal your shit?  If you do not have a DRO contract, my guards or myself will put a bullet in your skull.  If you do, your DRO drops you and you drop dead too.  Note that this is true even in the context of existing states.  &gt; How will roads be built?  By people who want to earn money from travelers.  &gt; Even if there are a multitude and you call them private law entities, its still more-or-less government.  We can call an apple "orange", it still does not change the nature of voluntarism embedded in the system.  &gt; Also, defense of property does NOT equal self-defense. It may be justified in some contexts, but it is simply not the same thing as self-defense.  Of course they are not the same.  But both are legitimate.  Naturally the only amount of violence morally permitted is the one just enough required to stop the aggression against a person or the robbery of property.  Nuking someone because he is stealing an apple is pretty much unjustified.  We can all recognize matters of degree here, stealing an apple is not the same as stealing a hundred cars is not the same as murdering someone, but all of them are wrong, wronger, wrongest but still wrong.
The stop sign looks like it says arret so it must be quebecland
Blovate much? no one would see it in those subreddits.
Looks like [vgcats](http://www.vgcats.com/comics/?strip_id=278) was pretty accurate.
Omniscience?
Broken Arrow was the first movie that taught me what atomic energy was and about nuclear power and what it can do. I remembered after I saw Broken Arrow, I couldnt sleep well for a week, totally freaked out that someplace relatively close could be bombed with a nuke, and i'd die from radiation fallout and I wouldnt even be able to see or feel the effect. Thankfully I was over this fear when The Rock came around and freaked me the fuck out AGAIN about that shit lol. Plus I hated needles very much at that time too, so, it was a doublewhammy for me.
For those downmodding this, read to the bottom. Then correct your mod. 
I sometimes wonder what sort of crazy technology I will have to deal with when I'm an old geezer.
&gt; No, Zionism is the belief that there is a home for Jews.  There is no home on this planet for people who believe in ethnic cleansing. Sorry.  *Edit: The subject of my comment is Israeli Zionists, not "Jews." It's truly sad that I have to redundantly clarify this ad nauseum.*
This is the plot of a bad 1950s B-movie.
Wow, recursive functions. Stop the presses!
Anyone used these before?  They seem highly useful but I couldn't say if they really work as advertised.
I'm not really sure how it matters.  If someone beats me because of the color of my skin (or any other characteristic for that matter), the only thing I care about is that I was beaten.  The *why* of it becomes rather inconsequential. If no violence is done to me but other actions are taken, like I'm fired for discriminatory reasons, *then* it matters because it is direct evidence of a wrongful termination.
holy christ too many roids.  we are not all like that.
Everyone in my household has at least 3 computers.  Also, I am the only member.
I appreciate your commentary but you missed the point of what I was saying. VW ABS is awesome though, at least in the mkiv... 100% feeling all the time and the wiggle room you have to brake hard and the separation between that and ABS at the end of the pedal is superb, much better than my moms auto pilot benz.
Bingo!  Right in one.
Sega Channel..  I haven't thought about that in a long time.  The thing I remember most is the music and the awesome menus.  And you got new stuff, new animated menus, etc every month.  The loading music is still stuck in my head, waiting what seemed like ages for games to load.  Someone recorded it!  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=sMRLZcBiN-k  Oh, and there was the limited SRAM in the thing.  My father would play golf or fishing and erase my Shining Force game.  Made me so mad!
how many times do we have to see this??????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????  Shit!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
We don't have a separation between state and church and I believe thats the case in Sweden, right?  But reading paddies comment is like reading my own - presice same experience and I even remember making fun of a girl who wouldn't have her confirmation. :-(   But Denmark got another big secular problem and thats new age shit, which many do believe in - its big business and I hear a lot of crap, from Feng Shui to foot massages that stimulates the urge to urinate - you name it and we got it!  So perhaps christianity haven't taking over, but new age quantum shit surely is becoming a problem
Democratic
Exactly!  It's becacuse "rape" and the entire sexual assault field have become so unnecessarily politicized.
Just downvoted. This isn't a real estate marketing site.
we have stop look and listen ads for the kids, and drive slower ads for the adults. both bases covered
&gt; According to Woods, the city will now make a point of alerting ticket officers about specific vehicles that police are looking for.  They weren't doing it before. WTFBBQ etc.
This morning, I had a strange dream that had Jennifer Aniston and Luke Wilson married in it. I then realized my sub concious was thinking about Marley And Me and I said aloud after I woke up "Oh come on!"
phone.
